Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Number of Reviews
30

Author
Jamie Peck
WILD THINGS
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
High school guidance counselor Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) is well-liked in the 
town of Blue Bay, especially by pretty, popular Kelly Van Ryan (Denise 
Richards), whose family name is among the Florida yachting enclave's most 
financially prominent. Hoping to take her crush to a physical level, Kelly 
seductively slinks into Lombardo's house after washing his jeep for a 
fundraiser, but, the very next day, tearfully admits to her trollop mother 
(Theresa Russell) that she was raped. Before long, Blue Bay detectives Ray 
Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega) are listening to 
similar allegations from Kelly's rebel classmate Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell). 
Lombardo, who maintains his innocence, hires neck brace-sporting, opportunistic 
lawyer Ken Bowden (Bill Murray) to defend him in court. 
The previews give away the following revelations, so if you haven't seen any of 
the movie's spots on the television or in the theater, you might want to skip to 
the next paragraph. While cross-examining Suzie on the witness stand, Bowden 
gets her to break down and admit that the alleged rapes never took place -- that 
Kelly had concocted this entire scheme because she was angry that Lombardo was 
sleeping with her mother and not with her. To pay Lombardo for the damages, 
Kelly's mother breaks her daughter's trust fund and gives him $8.5 million. But 
Lombardo, Kelly and Suzie are actually all working together, and plan to take 
the money and run as fast as they can. Duquette and Perez, however, begin to 
suspect that there's more afoot to the case than just false accusations. 
If there's a major drawback to "Wild Things," it's that it's oversexed to a 
fault. The much-talked-about hotel room menage-a-trois between Dillon, Campbell 
and Richards is a turn-off. It's also cut short (sorry, guys), and should have 
been cut shorter -- the movie grinds to a halt for pure titillation once too 
often. What we don't see is far more effective than what we do. Another example 
of this is Kevin Bacon needlessly going the full monty in a shower scene. Er, no 
thanks. Also, Bacon's Duquette feels simultaneously underdeveloped and 
overwritten. Daphne Rubin-Vega, from Broadway's "Rent," tries to compensate for 
a superfluous character. Theresa Russell is just plain wooden. And when, in the 
end, all is out in the open, ask yourself if certain scenes involving these 
three were really necessary. 
But what keeps the movie from being throwaway junk is an engaging chain of 
surprises (some predictable, some not) that never seems to end. "Wild Things" 
has more twists than a crate full of corkscrews, and most are so gleefully, 
over-the-top nasty that you can't help but be charmed by their absurd 
showmanship. A great deal of amusement also comes from watching Bill Murray in a 
supporting part that appears to have been written for his sly comedic talent; 
Murray's a stitch, especially when pulling up beside the Van Ryan limo after 
winning Lombardo's case and flipping them off. And don't leave when the closing 
credits hit the screen, or you'll miss the film's best part -- four bonus 
flashbacks that smooth over plot holes while offering a few more tiny turns, 
plus a final scene that caps everything off with a great stunner of a bombshell. 
Speaking of bombshells, Denise Richards, who plays almost every scene in a blue 
bikini top, does the teen tease thing with a malicious allure that she was never 
allowed to flaunt in "Starship Troopers." Matt Dillon flexes his sleepy-voiced 
sex appeal, and pulls off personality changes with chameleonic precision. Neve 
Campbell, lovely as ever except when sporting a blond wig, gives Suzie a 
vengeful vulnerability that makes her the most interesting member of the 
conspiring trio. Re-edited and toned down a bit, the dynamics between these 
three actors could have carried the film to greater lengths. But what we're 
given works well enough. "Wild Things" is highly entertaining and, indeed, very 
wild.

Author
ERIC WAY
        Wild Things is a suspenseful thriller starring Matt Dillon, Denise 
Richards, and Neve Campbell that deals with all the issues; sex, love,
 murder, and betrayal.
        The setting of the film is a town named Blue Bay.  It consists of 
many swamps and slums and, on the other hand, rich estates owned by 
the town's different benefactors.  The film opens just before the 
beginning of a senior seminar at the town's ritzy, expensive high 
school.  It is here that we meet all of the core characters.  There's 
guidance counselor Sam Lombardo, police officers Ray Duquette and 
Gloria Perez, dark mysterious senior Suzie Toller, and the popular 
head cheerleader Kelly Van Ryan.  We first see that all of the senior 
girls are smitten with the handsome guidance counselor, but none more 
than Kelly.          
        Throughout the first portion of the film we see how 
far Kelly will go to get Sam until she accuses him of rape.  Shortly 
after, Suzie, too, confesses that Sam raped her as well.  This pushes 
Kelly's sex craving mother, Sandra, to stop at nothing until Sam is 
convicted.  During the trial, Kelly gives a teary confession of how 
Sam raped her.  However, it is later revealed by Suzie that Sam never 
raped either of the girls, it was all a vengeful plan against the 
guidance counselor.  After Sam is cleared, Kelly's mother pays Sam a 
very substantial amount of cash in order for him not to sue her.  It 
is then revealed that Sam, Kelly, and Suzie were all in on it 
together.  It is here that the film starts to reveal just who is 
being honest with each other and who has their own hidden agenda.
        Matt Dillon stars as Sam Lombardo.  Sam is the kind of guy that 
every woman would like to sink their claws into, and Sam obviously 
knows it and uses it to his own advantage.  He isn't the obvious best 
of actors, but Dillon does give a convincing performance.  However, 
his talents seem to be rendered useless near the end of the film, 
making it look as though his character has lost all of his ethics and 
principles, although he never had many to start out with in the first 
place.
        Neve Campbell, who most people relate to Scream and Scream 2, plays 
Blue Bay outcast Suzie Toller.  Suzie obviously has some serious 
issues to deal with which are obvious from her first scene in the 
film.  Campbell is very successful with this character, adding the 
slightest bit of charm to a seemingly repulsive character and making 
her fun to watch.  
        Playing Kelly Van Ryan is Denise Richards.  Kelly is your typical, 
rich, sexy, head cheerleader who thinks she can have any man she 
choses, like her sexpot mother Sandra.  One of the most interesting 
things about this film is how it compares and contrasts the 
relationship between Kelly and her mother.  Denise Richards, still 
hot off the press from Starship Troopers, gives the most interesting 
performance in the entire film.  In the beginning, Kelly looks to be 
a paper thin character, but Richards adds a little more spice and 
ultimately makes the character not only sexy, but dominating as well.
        Kevin Bacon gives one of his fair performances as Ray Duquette.  
This character looks to be one of the most boring, predictable in the 
film.  However, it is a relationship revealed between him and Suzie 
that adds depth to his story.  Still, the film doesn't seem to gain 
much from Bacon's performance, only his name.  
        In the supporting cast, Theresa Russell plays the much oversexed 
Sandra Van Ryan, Daphne Rubin-Vega gives an unappealing performance 
as cop Gloria Perez, and Bill Murray shines as Sam's Lawyer, Ken 
Bowden.  Hats off to Murray for adding the perfect touch of comedy to 
the film.
        Although Wild Things was displayed by the press as being an erotic 
thriller, the eroticism, which is portrayed with good taste, is kept 
to a minimum and focuses more on the plot and the relationships 
between the characters. 
        This is truly a very good film worth seeing if your looking for a 
movie with a thick plot filled with it's share of twists.

Author
Matt Williams
Wild Things is a movie that prides itself on its deviations, both from
sexual norms as well as a plot as we know it.  This thriller is
overflowing with sex, violence, twisting relationships, and
double-crosses to the point that it becomes a mere parody of itself and
loses any lasting impact.
Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) is the guidance counselor at the high school
in the rich Florida yachting town of Blue Bay.  He is beloved by most of
the students, until one of them, rich girl Kelly Van Ryan (Denise
Richards) accuses him of rape.
Two cops, Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne
Rubin-Vega) are assigned the case.  Kelly's mother, Sandra (Theresa
Russell), who has had her own relationship with Sam in the past, is out
for blood, bringing in lawyer Tom Baxter (Robert Wagner) to ruin Sam's
life and career.  She also uses her considerable influence to pressure
Ray and Gloria to find Sam guilty.
Ray, however, seeks for the truth in an unlikely place.  A white trash
girl, Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell), with whom Ray has tangled in the
past, may hold the key to Sam's guilt or innocence.  But are her motives
pure?
There are so many twists, turns, and double-crosses in Wild Things that
the movie becomes unintentionally hilarious.  It reminded me of the
cartoon in which predator and prey keep unzipping their costumes,
reversing the situation ad infinitum.  The audience can only take so
much of this before abandoning the suspension of disbelief and any sense
of seriousness about the film. Then again, any movie which stages a
crucial courtroom showdown with Bill Murray as one of the attorneys
doesn't take itself all that seriously.
The film is chock full of predators (a fact which the film hammers in
with repeated gator sightings in the Florida swamps).  Each character,
though, is a predator, and (like in the aforementioned cartoon) it is up
to the audience to determine who is the prey.  This gives nearly every
main character a chance to play both the good guy and the bad guy, so,
while the audience may get lost, the actors sure look like they're
having a good time.
Still, the film would have been better if it declared its intentions
(without necessarily untangling its twists) as to whether it's trying to
be serious or not.  The film straddles the fence on this issue, and as
it stands, it is either a mistimed comedy or a poorly staged drama.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Scott Renshaw
WILD THINGS (1998)
(Columbia)
Starring:  Matt Dillon, Kevin Bacon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards, Bill
Murray, Theresa Russell.
Screenplay:  Stephen Peters.
Producers:  Steven A. Jones and Rodney M. Liber.
Director:  John McNaughton.
MPAA Rating:  R (adult themes, sexual situations, nudity, profanity, drug
use, violence)
Running Time:  113 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If Hollywood is going to insist on making awful films, the least it
could do is make them as wonderfully, hilariously awful as WILD THINGS.
There is a kind of Zen preposterousness certain films achieve -- oh, let's
use SHOWGIRLS as an example -- which makes them too much fun to dismiss.
They become impromptu "Mystery Science Theater" experiences, where you
find yourself hooting and commenting throughout the ridiculous situations,
plaster-of-Paris acting and quotably appalling dialogue.
     I'm not entirely sure that WILD THINGS isn't a huge, self-aware joke,
attempting to combine the Joe Eszterhas oeuvre (SHOWGIRLS, BASIC INSTINCT,
JADE) and grade-Z exploitation films bursting with busty women in the
swamps.  The plot begins with a South Florida high school guidance
counselor named Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) who finds himself accused of
rape by two of his students:  pouty, flirtatious rich-girl cheerleader
Kelly (Denise Richards), and wrong-side-of-the-tracks, tattooed,
pot-smoking trouble-maker Susie (Neve Campbell).  For the next 100 minutes
or so it spins off into a dozen different twists and turns of
double-dealing, accompanied by the kind of non-stop sleaze which would
make Eszterhas proud.  Soap opera threats snarled through clenched teeth?
Yep.  Career-threatening performances?  You betcha.  Chicks in cat fights?
Check.  Chicks in wet T-shirts?  Check.  Chicks making out with each
other?  Double-check.  Gratuitous full-frontal shower shot of Detective
Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) which reveals -- ahem -- just precisely how
many degrees of Kevin Bacon there are?  Double-double-check.
     And yet, as undeniably wretched as virtually every moment of WILD
THINGS is, I can't imagine anyone walking out on it.  The same kind of
perverse I-only-read-it-for-the-articles voyeurism which finds otherwise
sensible people pausing when they flip past Jerry Springer could have you
shaking your head and giggling non-stop.  In fact, the pseudo-serious but
scandal-grubbing television coverage of Lombardo's trial in WILD THINGS
serves as an apt metaphor for what we should be expecting from the film.
There's no way to take WILD THINGS seriously as a movie, any more than
it's possible to take "Melrose Place" seriously as topical drama or "Hard
Copy" seriously as journalism.  It's a lowest-common-denominator side show
of all the stuff we mock with knee-jerk superiority, yet still manages to
do gangbuster ratings.
     It is only a tremendously entertaining supporting turn by Bill Murray
which makes it hard to forgive WILD THINGS all its trespasses.  As
Lombardo's ambulance-chasing attorney, Murray brings a genuine comic touch
to the proceedings, one which doesn't force you to stop laughing to figure
out whether the humor is intentional.  When Murray's loose, confident work
exists alongside the ham-fisted conniving of Kelly's nasty mother (Theresa
Russell) and a smug member of the town elite (Robert Wagner), any possible
sense of planned parody vanishes.  Even the film's extended closing
credits coda, which back-tracks to explain how all the plotting comes
together, feels like a huge miscalculation.  If it matters that much
whether or not the plot makes sense, then WILD THINGS really _is_ that
bad.
     Perhaps it's just the eternal optimist in me which makes me want to
believe there was a logic behind the perverse inanity -- or perhaps that's
inane perversity -- of WILD THINGS.  Or perhaps it's the need to find a
reason why I'd rather sit through a film as bad as WILD THINGS again
before I'd sit through a "better" film like TWILIGHT.  I can't even call
it a "guilty pleasure," because it's not the film I enjoyed.  I did,
however, immensely enjoy the act of _not_ enjoying it.  Start-to-finish
trash just doesn't get much trashier than this, unless a certain writer's
name is attached to the script.  Somewhere, very soon, Joe Eszterhas will
be watching WILD THINGS and kicking himself because he didn't write it
first.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: March 20, 1998
Starring: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards,
Theresa Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega, Bill Murray, Robert Wagner
Directed by: John McNaughton
Distributed by: Columbia Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: R (strong sexuality, nudity, language, some violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/wildthings.htm
Okay, so it was mostly gratuitous. How else can you explain a scene
where a guy convinces two girls to make out on the premise that it's a
"victory celebration"? No, the champagne didn't have anything to do with
it. It was gratuitous. And like most other movies starring "the
beautiful people" these days, it was not only gratuitous, but it
involves a lot of immoral acts, scandalous trickery, and blatant
disregard for any socially redeeming values. How else to describe a
movie that's shallow on character, centered around the heist of eight
million dollars, and filled with catfights, pot smoking, perjury, and
shameless greed? If you haven't already guessed, there's nothing deep
about WILD THINGS, but it's the sort of thriller that's good for a
once-over. 
If you've seen PALMETTO, then you know just about what to expect from
this one. Put man and woman together and throw in sex and money. Yes,
there's more of a plot than that, but it's nothing more than an excuse
to use the theme. Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon), a popular guidance
counselor at Blue Bay High is accused of rape by popular teen socialite
Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards). It doesn't help Sam that Kelly's mom,
Sandra (Theresa Russell), is a rich widow who's out to bury the guidance
counselor. It doesn't help him, either, when pot addict Suzie Toller
(Neve Campbell) comes forward to confirm the story. Luckily for Sam,
he's got a genius of a sleazeball lawyer (Bill Murray) to pull out all
the stops in court and get Sam off the hook with a cool eight mil.
Unfortunately, the route to Sam's non-guiltyness unearths a lot of other
unlikely truths. 
This movie belongs to Bill Murray and Kevin Bacon (who plays the
detective assigned to Kelly's rape claims). Murray's straight-faced
humor is one of the few bright spots among the otherwise stoic cast, and
Bacon's cop is a good number. Unfortunately for Kevin, his role fades
into stereotype when he pushes too far. We like to see him ask the tough
questions, but when he keeps asking them and doesn't relent, he becomes
every made-for-TV-drama policeman with a gut feeling. The rest of the
cast is wholly unlikeable for at least one moral excess. Dillon, whom
the audience believes is good for the most part, loses a lot of that as
the movie drags on. And while it does run fairly well through a
108-minute span, there are some lulls. Bring some popcorn. 
The script is what's pure gold about WILD THINGS. It takes a twistier
route to the conclusion than TWILIGHT, which had previously taken the
award for most turnabouts in one script. Your jaw will drop open at
some, and expect others (it's easy to tell when a character is about to
bite the dust, or, as the case may be, swim with the fishes). All in
all, WILD THINGS is a fun thriller, more energetic than other recent box
office efforts. It's also the kind of movie you forget all about twenty
minutes after you're out of the theater, so come with an open mind and
don't expect much to get the most out of this one.
FINAL AWARD FOR "WILD THINGS": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Author
Homer Yen
If controversial talk show host Jerry Springer, renowned for fighting
guests and sensational subjects, ever wanted to live in a town that
would provide an endless well of scheming characters and bizarre
relationships, he might want to move into the upscale Florida enclave
of Blue Bay.  He could base an entire week of shows on Teacher of the
Year, Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon).  When we first meet him, he appears
to be one of the most earnest of people - forthright and constantly
looking out for the interest of his students.  We also meet two of his
pupils.  One is an underachieving, wrong-side-of-the-tracks Suzie
Toller (Neve Campbell) and another is the richest girl in the
community, Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards).  But in noirish movies
such as this, nothing is what it seems.
Immediately, we know that we are in for a strange movie experience.
As the beginning credits roll, we are hypnotized with a pulsating
drumbeat and guitar riffs that eerily twang for several measures.  We
also see opening scenes of the Floridian swamps and the crocodiles
that lie in wait suggesting a place of bitter secrets.  The filmmaker
quickly establishes that we are in a place slightly skewed from
reality.
Kelly has the blatant hots for Mr. Lombardo.  She makes excuses to get
close to him by asking for rides and washing his car.  We eventually
see Kelly standing in Lombardo's living room, dressed in a white shirt
and white shorts, dripping wet after washing his car, and looking
lustily at the surprised teacher.  However, the scene quickly moves
ahead and we see her leave the house, angry and distressed.  What has
happened?  She tells her mom, who is an ex-lover of Lombardo and the
most powerful person in Blue Bay, that she was raped.  Infuriated, the
police are summoned and the lead detective (Kevin Bacon) arrests the
teacher.  This entire setup, which takes about 45 minutes to develop,
finally leads to a trial.   After a surprise testimony, the film
quickly moves from a stale drama to a psychological thriller for the
remaining hour.
>From here, a new and twisted story begins to emerge, and this is where
the real fun begins.  However, it would be a crime for me to reveal to
you anything more.  But it becomes more engaging and amusingly campy
as it progresses.  Hidden motives emerge, unlikely alliances are
discovered and manipulative mind games are played with such fervor
that your movie-watching experience becomes almost voyeuristic.  
 "Wild Things" is like driving really fast down a winding country road
at night without any headlights.  You never know what's ahead of you
but you find your trip reckless yet thrilling.  This is the kind of
movie that you'll either like or hate.  There is no middle ground.
There are surprises galore and the atmosphere is decidedly both
libidinous and bent.  For example, there is a hot three-way "love"
scene that happens among the principal actors which will either appall
you or cement the fact that this is a slick production about
manipulation that heightens the psychologically twisted plot.  "Wild
Things" is trashy, bizarre, lurid, and demented.   And I liked it.

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Matt Dillon, Kevin Bacon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards, and
Billy Murray
Ingredients: Sexy teenage bisexuals, murder, money, secret plans
Synopsis: 
When a movie has a name like 'Wild Things,'  I start to predict: either
the film is a PORKY'S style college-kids comedy, or it's one of those
sleazy B-grade flicks in the 'suspense' section of the local video store
- - the type filled with bottom dwelling acting talent: like maybe a
lady runs around in her lingerie, a guy gets decieved, and lots of sex
is somehow involved. Turns out, WILD THINGS is B-grade pulp sex, murder,
and money flick. The good thing about it is, if you can get past the
long (45-minute) beginning, WILD THINGS turns into a trashy entertaining
whodunit. 
In the small wealthy coastal Florida town of Blue Bay, high school
guidance counselor Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) stands accused of raping
nubile student Kelly Van Ryan (a gaunt Denise Richards). The film
proceeds with the standard rape trial plot until another hot high
schooler named Suzie (Neve Campbell) testifies with surprise
information, resulting in a lucrative settlement. So much for the long
part. 
Now the movie starts to get interesting. When persistent cop Ray (Kevin
Bacon) gets suspicious and continues digging up information on the
involved parties even after the trial has ended, Ray finds a video
camera and films hot high school babes in bikinis engaged in erotic
tongue action. Even more important, the involved parties start turning
up dead. What's going on here? Who is connected to whom, and who gets
the money in the end?
Opinion: 
Fans of scream queen Neve Campbell will be satisfied with her starring
role in WILD THINGS. On the other hand, Campbell and Denise Richards
play high school sexpots, and the ill-timed pedophilia themes of WILD
THINGS are likely to strike an angry nerve in American 1990s audiences,
since today school behavior and educational reform are THE hottest
political topics. 
WILD THINGS falls under a tried and true category: 'suspense, noir, and
deception among rich blue bloods at a beach front town.' But in a way,
it's a new spin on the old formula. Instead of featuring yuppies at a
New England cape or lifeguards and starlets at a California point, the
setting of WILD THINGS is Florida. Another thing that's different about
WILD THINGS is that after the surprise ending, the movie continues to
play, showing many little flashback scenes explaining the various tricks
the bad guy uses in order to deceive us. Very original. 
Director John McNaughton must be fond of twists and turns. The big
questions in this movie are: Who's the killer, who gets the money, and
what's the connection? But just when the crowd thinks it has everything
figured out, WILD THINGS tosses in another riddle.
Suspenseful erotic thriller? Not quite. More like B-grade whodunit, with
lots of gratuitous silicon and lips action. But I'll say this: trashy
and unbelievable as it is, WILD THINGS provides likable tongue-in-cheek
intellectual entertainment because it really keeps you guessing.

Author
Vallejo
 _________________________________________________________
 The recent onslaught of film noir that has popped up in multiplexes, with
everything ranging from "L.A. Confidential" to "Palmetto" to "The Big
Lebowski," has proved to be an artistic commodity for veteran, talented
directors. With this particular genre, directors are able to collate the
sleazy underworld of the lower-class and the glamorous, opulent upper-class,
while maintaining the noirish, ambiguous ambience, the staple of film noir.
 "Wild Things" could be classified as a black comedy, a sultry film noir or a
plain ol' erotic thriller, but the one category it doesn't qualify for is that
of a quality motion picture. Overacted, overwrought and overlong, "Wild
Things" is a confused mess, a movie that wants to have its cake and eat it
too. With its incalculable twists, turns, more twists and more turns, it soon
becomes a tedious exercise in pointlessness. In spite of game efforts by Kevin
Bacon and Matt Dillon, who manage to sustain straight faces throughout the
ordeal, "Wild Things" not once jells in its eroticism, unpredictability,
character motivation, sense of the world, plot, etc. There's not one redeeming
quality in the picture that is not technical.
 Directed by John McNaughton ("Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer"), "Wild
Things" follows Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon), a hunkish, suburban Florida high
school teacher who's the dream of every spruced up female in the community.
Particularly one. Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards) adores him to such extent
that she offers to wash his Jeep with a partner. Soon, her tiny shorts are
soaked and tells the other girl to take a hike, enabling her to come into his
house. Next thing, she cries rape. And the so-called "roller-coaster ride"
ensues.
 A second accuser comes front, Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell), a booze-drinkin',
tattooed piece of trailer trash that charges Lombardo of sexually molesting
her, virtually guaranteeing a trial where preposterous confessions, asinine
occurrences and laughable courtroom procedures are bound to happen. Even Bill
Murray gets into the act as Lombardo's zany lawyer. He wears a fake neck-
brace, waves the finger at the other client and infuses the script with some
Billy Murray. You can tell McNaughton knew he had nothing to lose assigning
Murray to this role. As ridiculous as it sounds, he's the most sane character
in the movie. 
The community is astonished. Reporters flee to the scene. There's an
8.5-million settlement for a libel suit against Kelly's mother (Theresa
Russell). There's the ambiguous cop (Kevin Bacon, who also executive produced)
who sniffs something iffy in this concoction of deceit, murder and lust. We,
the audience, sniff something
not so lustful.
 Like so many thrillers these days, including "The Usual Suspects" and "The
Game," "Wild Things" eschews character for plot. McNaughton knows how to
handle the camera, and he keeps the campy fillings of the script flowing with
workmanlike ease, as if he knows the territory he's covering is a harmless
appetizer to accompany "Henry," a furious, unsettling film directorial tour-
de-force. George Clinton's score is a delight to behold. But it's the humans.
The characters are mere devices for the "nasty" twists. What writer Stephen
Peters does not grasp is this becomes tediously uninvolving, almost
unbearable,  if those who inhibit this twisted world are not interesting,
don't feel real or we don't care for them. Not even the unintentionally funny
moments work. The people in "Wild Things" are not so much people as they are
caricatures.
 Then there's the erotic content, which nearly earned the film an NC-17, for a
sexless, badly edited, poorly lit menage-a-trois. And in what has to be one of
the most flabbergastingly inept scenes that has graced this country, Kevin
Bacon's member makes a cameo appearance with ten minutes to go. Ironically,
the wildest elements of "Wild Things" are not wild at all.

Author
Bill Chambers
Kem Nunn and Stephen Peters must have been on something when they wrote the
script. for this thing.
It's campy, it's cheezy as cheetos, and half the time it careens from one plot
twist to another in a paint by numbers fashion. 
Oh yeah, it's almost pornographic, too.
Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) is a guidence counsellor/sailing instructor at a
high school in the ritzy Miami suburb of Blue Bay.
We begin the movie with Sam moderating a class called `senior seminar,' and
today's program features police detectives Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and
Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega) in a discussion of SEX CRIMES! 
That's right folks! No sooner has the word been uttered than we find Kelly Van
Ryan (Denise Richards), the rich high school slut, trying to get into Sam's
pants. 
But poor Sam doesn't (apparently) want her to, because he's already done it
with Kelly's mom (Theresa Russell) and is currently working on Mom's lawyer's
daughter (Jennifer Bini).
Ah! But what about Suzie (Neve Campbell)? Yes...Suzi, the everglades punker.
She's hanging around too from the very beginning, getting ready to pounce.
Kelly makes her move. Sam (apparently) rebuffs her. So we get the old `Refusal
of sex? Then it must be rape' ploy. Detectives Duquette and Perez are on the
case! Then Suzie says SHE was raped by Sam too!
Sam's life goes in the toilet. His girlfriend won't sleep with him any more
and her father (Robert Wagner) gets him kicked out of the yacht club.
Fortunately, our hero (?) has hired a lawyer, and in keeping with the tone of
the movie, he just has to be Bill Murray...
Murray is at his best here. Sleazy as hell and wearing a neck brace in case
insurance agents drop by, it's almost a shock to see that he's actually
competent. 
It was all a plot. Murray forces Suzy to admit she and Kerry made it all up.
The scene's a real hoot.
Then we get to the first unexpected plot twist. 
We can tell you about the first unexpected plot twist because it's in the
trailer. 
Sam was in on the whole thing, and soon he and his two erstwhile accusers are
making love on the screen right in front of you. Then we have the lesbian love
scenes, and then things get weird.
Now Detective Duquette is unhappy at being duped. He is sure that it was a
plot to get Kerry's mom's money from the lawsuit that followed the confession.
They made us promise not to tell what the surprise ending is. And yes, there
is one after about twelve more unexpected plot twists.
Then they try unsuccessfully to explain the surprise ending through flashbacks
in the middle of the closing credits. 
Nekkid high school students with large boobs!!! Now that's what we in the
business call `high art!'

Author
Boyd Petrie
WILD THINGS (1998)
Rated R for strong sexuality, nudity, language and violence.
----------  Out of 4 stars: ***1/2 (3 1/2 Stars)
Starring: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards,
Theresa Russell, Daphne Rubin-Vega
As much as I wanted to like this film as I went into it, the more
pleased I was when I left.  First, getting through all the usual lines
of newspaper glitz:  "If you liked Scream, you'll love Wild Things!"
"Campbell gives a stunning performance!"  "This twisty plot will have
you dazzled for days!" (Oh yeah, the day a newspaper uses these is the
day Neve Campbell falls in love with me)
Now, onto more serious stuff (and with this film, I mean that in nearly
a sarcastic way).  WILD THINGS has single-handedly broken down the rules
surrounding the R rating from the MPAA.  I'm not saying that in a bad
way, but when you see this film, you may be shocked by what you see.
However, perhaps the MPAA was pleased by the film's charming cast and
tricky plot, that they let the film slide with an R rating.  Being
Mormon, I'm bound to hear an uproar from religious zealots warning me
not to see the film.  Trouble is, I have already seen it.  And I like
it!
WILD THINGS is a film noir of the 90s, filled with 40s sensibilities,
and yet breaking the rules and modern-day taboos of 90s culture.  The
style in which it is filmed is rich in color.  The actors are all
gorgeous people, seemingly drawn from the same gene pool and placed into
this film.  Sure, it's all too good to be true, but ain't it fun to
watch?  When movies like this come along (sort of a better version of
Basic Instinct) there is bound to be people who either love it or hate
it.  There will be people who don't want to admit liking what they see,
but I tell you, most anyone who sees this will like it.
WILD THINGS begins at Blue Bay High School, the one high school in the
world that any teenager would love to get into.  It's almost as if
students are put through entrance exams just for admittance (totally
based on looks alone).  Of course, there are those select few who may
look slightly ugly, but compared to the average person, they are
gorgeous.  Immediately, the film finds its tone and the audience settles
in for an enjoyable time.  We can turn off our brains, right?  Wrong.
While you may be expecting one thing to happen, it certainly doesn't
turn out that way.
The film begins in a classroom, with nearly all the main characters
present.  There's Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon), a counselor for the
students.  He's heading the class discussion.  There's also Kelly Van
Ryan (Denise Richards), a snobby rich teen who has fallen in love with
Sam.  Teaching the class, however, are two policemen: Ray Duquette
(Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega), who want to talk
about 'Sex... (Cheers) Crimes (Boos)'.  "What is a sex crime?" Ray
asks.  "Not gettin' any!" one student responds.  This pretty much sets
the tone of the film we are about to watch.  However, upon hearing this,
one student, Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell), stands up and leaves the
room, commenting that they can both kiss part of her body.  And so, WILD
THINGS sets into motion.
Quickly, Kelly begins hitting on Sam, but Sam doesn't want anything to
do with her advances.  Kelly is stubborn and continues to pursue him.
She even pleads with him to let her wash his Jeep.  Surprisingly, that's
really all I can tell you about the plot.  Any more would give away one
of the many crucial plot twists.  And what's more, these plot twists are
actually unpredictable.  Going along the way of SCREAM, WILD THINGS
maintains that film's surprises, and then adds even more to them.  There
are more plot twists in this film than probably any I have ever seen.
And even though you think you may get tired of them, the surprises are
so genuine that it's rather pleasing.  Going back over them in my mind,
nearly all of them work, though some stretch the boundaries of belief.
Thankfully, the convoluted plot doesn't give us much time to think about
each one, pouncing yet another twist on us before the shock of the
previous one has worn off.
As for the critics who complain that the film is trashy--well, it is.
This is pretty much just one trashy film.  However, it is the kind of
trashy that isn't hard to watch.  It's good trash, in a sense.  One, the
screenplay knows that it's not to be taken seriously, and it includes a
lot of humor and satire into the story.  This varies everywhere from
Kelly's mother (Theresa Russell), who is more of a caricature of rich
people, all the way to an ambulance-chasing lawyer (Bill Murray), who
wears a neck-brace to cover an insurance scam he is running.  Bill
Murray also provides the best character in the film, and most of the
genuine laughs.  And two, the sex is more than gratuitous, although not
unwelcomed.  WILD THINGS is supposed to have sex in it (what film with
that title wouldn't?), and this movie breaks the boundaries.  Instead of
having heterosexual sex scenes, it also includes lesbian scenes between
Denise Richards and Neve Campbell (don't worry... it's not as graphic as
you might think).  The heterosexual scenes are quite graphic, but the
surprise shocker is Kevin Bacon's full-frontal nude scene.  It's very
brief, so if you blink, you may miss (ahem) it.  And, for as long as I
can remember, I don't think I have seen an R-rated film show an erect
one before (it's not completely, but judging from the audiences'
reaction, it was more than they expected too).  Also, during one scene
late in the film, there seemed to be a relationship brewing between
Bacon and Dillon's characters, but nothing came of it (makes you wonder
if the director had to cut it in order for the R rating, or if the
actors refused to do it).
What first made me want to see WILD THINGS was its cast.  Neve Campbell,
of course, has been one of my favorite actresses since the SCREAM films
were released.  Here, however, she turns every typical role she has done
on its head and plays a gothic pothead.  The closest role to this was
her performance in THE CRAFT (though even in that she was a nice girl).
Campbell is probably the best in the film and shows her wide range of
talent.  You can tell she will be around for a long time.  Denise
Richards will also be around for a long time, although she may be
limited to the roles without much range.  Here, she gets to express more
emotions than in her stiff (yet effective) performance in STARSHIP
TROOPERS.  Hopefully one day she will land a very good role that can
display her ability.  And then there is Daphne Rubin-Vega, a newcomer to
the movies.  She gives a very good performance, although her character
is mostly left to the background for the first hour and a half.  Towards
the end she does get a bigger part.  On the male side, Matt Dillon is
probably the best, giving a subtle performance that surprises with every
twist.  Kevin Bacon has a slightly wooden character, but he makes the
most of it.  You must have admiration, though, for what he did on
screen.  And judging from many of the women's reactions in the theater
to that shot, they have grown a deeper appreciation for Bacon (yeah,
right).  And then there is Bill Murray.  His performance is the comic
relief, and he nearly steals the film.  As a whole, the entire cast
works wondrously together, and they seem at home, even when doing the
menage a troi.
Director John McNaughton, who has previously done the critically
acclaimed HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER, has constructed a
wonderfully twisty plot that works.  His direction is smooth and
stylish.  The visuals are striking, filled with rich colors, and almost
so realistic that we can actually breathe the humidity in the air.
However, he seems more at home when the actors aren't talking.  His
fly-by shots of the swampy areas are brilliant, and his photography of
Denise Richards' climbing out of the pool is a highlight.  The
cinematography is gorgeous in its details.  Its not often that you see a
film like this, and we should watch it just to see how the camera can
take pictures.  Then, there is the music.  This was probably the most
obvious thing to me, as it set the perfect mood for the film.  It's hard
to describe in words, so just see the film and listen to it.  It's
wonderfully composed and presented.  And be sure to stick around during
the closing credits!  McNaughton has finally put the ending credits to
good use (while most comedies use it for outtakes).  He has included
some small scenes which help explain the preceding events.  Some may say
that these are lame attempts to explain the convoluted plot, but it's an
entertaining way to finish the film.  Plus, there are some shocking
moments in these ending credits which just add to the fun.
WILD THINGS is appropriately rated R for strong sexuality, nudity,
language and violence.  Again, the nudity is rather unnecessary, but
let's face it--people want to see it.  So why not give it to them?  Neve
Campbell, admirably, has a no-nudity clause in her contract, and the
most you see of her is from behind as she takes her top off (way to go,
Neve!).  The sex scenes are graphic, especially the first one we see,
between the mother and one of her deck hands.  One almost wonders how
they got away with the R rating.  The language is quite harsh too,
ranging from sexual innuendo to your average, everyday profanity.  And I
can't stress it enough: Don't allow kids under 18 to see this film.  The
target age for the movie is the 18-24 range, and that's who should see
it.  It's definitely not for those under 18!  Did I mention that this
film is rated R?  However, for those that do get a chance to watch it,
you will probably more likely be pleased, and may even take friends to
see it the next time.
Reviewed by Respect (respect@aros.net)
http://www.aros.net/~respect/movies.html

Author
Jason Overbeck
Wild Things is the sleazy cousin of Palmetto (of earlier this year). 
This one has more sex, nudity, laughs and twists.  It is also a better
film.  It is fun to watch a film that keeps twisting and contorting as
it explains the plot and buries you more.
Wild Things is about a girl (Denise Richards) who accuses a school
counsler (Matt Dillon) of sexually abusing her.  Later another girl
(Neve Campbell) files similar charges.  Up to this point the film is
noir melodrama and looking quite good.  Then something unexpected
happens, Dillon hires Bill Murray as an ambulance chasing lawyer to
handle his case.
Comedians don't get much credit for their work in films.  I will tell
you that Wild Things without Bill Murray wouldn't work.  It would look
like a Tarantino drone (like every crime-related film).  He adds life to
this film and an insanly funny 20 minutes.  I want to be very clear
about this, Bill Muray is funnier in this 20 minutes of this film than
he was in The Man Who Knew Too Little.  
Murray (very hilariously) gets the case thrown out of court and
convinces Dillon to sue the first girls mother for ruining his career. 
Then we get a twist, Dillon, Campbell, and Denis Richards are all in it
together.  They are also involved in a minage a trois.  We get a spicy
sex scene, then another twist and another.......
With all the twists you don't really feel used by the plot, like you did
with Palmetto.  You are entralled and try to out think the plot, to a
point.  I felt there was one too many twists for complete satisfaction. 
The film you are left with is somewhat of a mess, but a fun one.
Much has been made about the sexual explicetness of the material.  There
are a few steamy sex scenes but the film seems to cheat on us.  An old
rule is that eroticism is what is left unseen.  I have no problem with
that, but what is Neve Campbell doing in a film that intends to show
all.  Denis Richards is naked, and so is Kevin Bacon (very briefly) but
the sex scenes cut away whenevery Neve takes off her shirt.  It may
sound shallow or may look like I'm trying to be cute but that is not
it.  I like twisty film noirs like this.  Bound of 1996 was a great one,
and it had one sex scene to speak of.  It didn't promise the explicet
though, and Wild Things did, if it would have been more truthful to
itself my grade would have been higher.  Neve if the script calls for
something explicet, don't nix the idea because you are too prude for it,
pass the idea to another actress who will remain TRUE to the material as
written and promised.

Author
Steve Kong
Wild Things falls into the "stupid but fun" group.  The plot is laughable,
the dialogue is hilarious, and all the major performers think they're in
different types of pictures.  Even the director looks like he's unable to
figure out what kind of movie this is supposed to be.
In the hardly sleepy town of Blue Bay resides a high school where all the
students look like magazine models.  In Blue Bay, people sleep with just
about everyone else; "promiscuity" is as common a word as "eating."  People
in this town look good and dress to promote themselves. So, what's the
problem in this town?
A student, Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards), claims her counselor, Sam
Lombardo (Matt Dillon), raped her.   But did he?  There is a doubt to Van
Ryan's claims until another student, Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell), comes
forward and says that Sam Lombardo too raped her.  Investigating this rape
case are two Blue Bay cops, Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez
(Daphne Rubin-Vega).
To tell any more of the story would spoil the movie.  Wild Things tries
hard to entertain the audience.  At most points the twists and turns in the
script work-but barely.  Wild Things is by far an example of how to make a
movie so bad that it actually looks good.
The twists and turns in Wild Things are mostly predictable but it is the
execution that makes them so enjoyable.  As I was watching the film, I was
trying to guess when and what would come up next.  And like James
Berardinelli, a prominent Internet film critic, I missed only one of the
twists.  However, as I said, it's the execution that makes the twist so
fun.  The script by Kem Numm and Stephen Peters has dialogue that goes so
deeply overboard it is laughable.
The lead performers, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, and Denise Richards all
play their parts  tongue in cheek.  Dillon is likeable as the beat up
school counselor Lombardo.  Campbell seems to be relishing her part as the
tramp in the trailer park.  And Richards is given a handful more lines than
she had in Starship Troopers, but she is not given much more to work with.
In the supporting roles look for two outstanding performances; Bill Murray
as a Lombardo's sleazy lawyer and new comer Daphne Rubin-Vega as Kevin
Bacon's partner. Wild Things is full of unintentional laughs but Murray
brings some much-needed intentional comedy to Wild Things.  Rubin-Vega is a
newcomer but gives a wonderful performance.
For bad performers look for Robert Wagner as Kelly Van Ryan's lawyer and
Theresa Russell as Kelly Van Ryan's slutty mom.  Wagner seems to believe
that he is in a serious movie and sticks out like a sore thumb. My
favourite Wagner moment is when Wagner meets Dillon's Lombardo and says,
"You're finished in Blue Bay.  Get lost!"  I laughed and cringed at this
line.  Theresa Russell seems to be parodying herself in this film.
Wild Things is a largely commercially aimed film.  How do I know that?  It
is gratuitous.  But, you might ask, in what?  The answer:  it has
everything that will bring near or post-pubescent boys to the theatres:
sex and violence.  And for those of you curious, Denise Richards and
Theresa Russell get topless scenes and Kevin Bacon gets a full frontal nude
scene.
Should you see Wild Things?  Yes.  I'd recommend Wild Things during a
matinee showing.  This film is an unintentional comedy with a twist of
mystery and twist of thriller.  Sure, the film is trash, but it's fun
trash.  Don't pick up and leave once you see the credits!  There are some
fun credit cookies that will throw in more twists.  Don't Miss Wild Things
in the theatres.

Author
Berge Garabedian
>From the man who presented us with HENRY: THE PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL
KILLER (6.5/10) comes a wild tale set within the elite and white trash
of Florida's South Coast.
PLOT:
Guidance Counselor (Dillon) is accused of raping one of his students.
She happens to be the daughter of one of the wealthiest women in
Florida. The counselor is brought to court on the charges, as another
white trash girl (Campbell), also joins the rape finger-pointing club.
As the story unfolds, we find that many things aren't exactly as they
seem (that's as much as I could say without ruining anything).
CRITIQUE:
Good little flick that slows down at certain points, and runs a tad
long, but generates enough twists and turns to keep most people
interested throughout. Mind you, I could see many people not liking it
because it takes "one too many" twists and turns, but hey, I happen to
like that kind of thing. And besides, the twists and turns in this
movie managed to remain within the realm of believability (or
scathingly close to), and even "explained" many of its turns with a
showcase of missed scenes during the credit crawl at the end of the
film (DO NOT leave the theatre before you see the credits...it really
does clear up some stuff !!).
Other than that, the acting was good, with Campbell transforming her
"good girl stereotypical" role into a pot-smoking, goth-looking white
trash chick out for a good time. Denise Richards (from STARSHIP
TROOPERS (7/10) fame) solidifies herself as Hollywood's jelly-donut
pinup girl of the moment, and proves that all breast implants needn't
lead to lawsuits. Bacon is solid, and so is Dillon (while continuing to
prove his inability to age to the whole wide wondering world !!).
Sprinkle the story with a bunch o' shots of alligators peeking through
the swamp waters, Bacon showing the world the size of his ding-dong (do
we really need to see this??), a couple of lesbian kissing scenes, and
a menage-a-trois, and you've got yourself a decent time at the movie
theatre.
On the down side, the soundtrack was not as prominent (or slick) as I
thought it would be, and Theresa Russell (real name: Theresa Paup)
seems to have lost her way in every which way possible....ooooh, I
almost forgot Bill Murray's exquisite role as the down-trodden lawyer
who agrees to defend Dillon in court. Murray actually added that extra
little spice of humour that allowed this film to affirm its position as
a quirky little noirish tale of sex, greed and mystery. 
Little Known Facts: 
Neve Campbell specified a non-nudity clause in her contract (she's also
born in Guelph, Ontario...go hoser!)
Director John McNaughton says he deleted a scene that would have shown
Matt Dillon and Kevin Bacon showering together, as it was gratuitous.
Kevin Bacon plays in a band with his brother, called The Bacon
Brothers, is married to actress Kyra Sedgwick, and has a game based on
him called "Six Degrees of Kevin Bacon".

Author
Michael Dequina
Aaron Spelling meets Joe Eszterhas!  Not exactly words of praise, but they
are in reference to John McNaughton's erotic thriller Wild Things, which
shamelessly melds the best of both trashy worlds with a most welcome sense
of humor.
The Wild Things of the title are two high school girls that could have
come straight from a Spelling soap: snotty, upper crust Kelly Van Ryan
(Denise Richards) and punky Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell), the average girl
from the wrong side of the tracks.  These two opposites are united when
they both cry rape at the hands of school guidance counselor Sam Lombardo
(Matt Dillon), who has a reputation for being a womanizer.  These sordid
charges set off a chain of bewildering, ever-twisting chain of events that
come to entangle a surprisingly varied cross-section of Blue Bay, Florida's
population.
Wild Things wouldn't be an erotic thriller without sex, and McNaughton and
Peters pull off some of the most heated doozies this side of Joe Eszterhas.
 Most notorious of these scenes is a steamy menage a trois; on paper it
would appear to be a shock tactic on the Eszterhas level, but the act plays
an important role within the context of the story.  The actor whose role
shoulders most of the sexiness duties is Richards, and she proves to be a
smoldering carnal presence, whether merely coming out of a pool or standing
still in dripping wet clothing.  Too bad she can't act worth a damn,
proving that her painfully inept work in Starship Troopers was no fluke.
The assembled media in the audience could not control their laughter during
a straight-faced crying scene (think Elizabeth Berkley, but with tears),
nor could they hold it in as a stiff pout remained glued to her face when
Kelly is treated to a poolside grilling by detective Ray Duquette (Kevin
Bacon).
The trailer to Wild Things gives away a key plot twist (which I still
won't reveal here), but even if you have seen that trailer, there are
plenty of surprises up the film's sleeve.  That's just one of strengths of
Stephen Peters's well-crafted script, which spins plot reversals that shock
without completely violating logic or common sense.  Yes, some twists _are_
outlandish, and that's where his refreshing sense of humor is tonic.  I
don't believe Richards meant to be funny, but there is plenty of
intentional humor that keeps this knowingly trashy story from taking itself
too seriously.  When two at-odds characters display a surprising affection
toward each other, this out-of-left-field development is made more
tolerable by Duquette's absolutely priceless comic reaction to it.
Humor also springs from Peters's wide, sudsy canvas of characters.  Bill
Murray is a hoot as Sam's neck brace-wearing shyster attorney, who has
built a career on fraudulent insurance claims.  Also adding quirky laughs
to the proceedings are more peripheral characters, such as rich, pompous
attorney Tom Baxter (Robert Wagner) and Kelly's slutty mom Sandra (Theresa
Russell).  It is to Peters's credit that these minor players make as
distinct and lasting impressions as more prominent ones, such as Suzie,
Sam, Kelly, or detectives Duquette and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega).
But Wild Things remains a plot-driven movie, and the story is never less
than engrossing and, in the end, satisfying.  And I mean the _very_ end.
Don't be fooled by the "The End" card that appears to conclude the action.
Even more developments--and important insight--are revealed as the final
cast list unspools.    The wild ride that is Wild Things is indeed
manipulative trash that appeals to audiences' basest instincts, but at
least it makes no bones about it--and works.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown@michaeljordanfan.com  |  mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
Personal Page: http://welcome.to/w3md
CinemaReview Magazine: http://www.CinemaReview.com
"I didn't know what to expect. It's like something you chase
 for so long, but then you don't know how to react when you
 get it.  I still don't know how to react."
--Michael Jordan, on winning his first NBA championship in 1991
...or, my thoughts after meeting him on November 21, 1997

Author
Ryan Davis
The neatest part about Wild Things is how it forced me to watch the
credits. By revealing key parts to the plot(I use this term loosely.)
in-between the credits, the filmmakers managed to keep three-fourths of the
audience in their seats until the credits completed, an impressive
achievement. 
I can only tell you a small portion of the movies plot, or you will miss
guessing the laughable plot twist. High school senior Kelly Van Ryan(Denise
Richards) falls in love with her guidance counselor, Sam Lombardo(Matt
Dillon). Kelly tries several times to lure him into an intimate
relationship, but when her attempts fail she accuses him of rape. Jumping
on the rape charge bandwagon Suzie Toller(Neve Campbell) accuses Sam, with
the two accusations he is quickly taken to court. Sam, out of money and
desperate for a lawyer, hires a sleazy insurance fraud attorney, Ken
Bowden(Bill Murray, in the best performance of the film.). Following a
confusing trial Sam's case is dismissed and all charges are dropped, this
is done by way of several predictable plot twists. When Sam is cleared of
the charges he sues Kelly's rich mother and receives a little over eight
million. So now you have to figure out who's playing who, and who should
anyone trust? There are so many plot twist in this movie its almost funny,
its sad that all the twist are ultra predictable and illogical.  
The cast is, on the most part, highly attractive.  They all get
opportunities through the film to display their bodies, there is even a
threesome scene with Denise Richards, Matt Dillon, and Neve Campbell. The
best actual performance is that of Bill Murray as the lawyer who makes his
money off insurance fraud, its a hilarious piece of work and he steals all
the scenes he's in. I could spend all day pointing out how bad the other
performances were, but then I wouldn't be able to tell you about the good
parts. 
This is a funny movie, I don't know if it was meant to be serious but I was
laughing out loud at some of the scenes. Maybe it was just the
implausibility or maybe the terrible dialogue, but it was just really
funny.  If you are looking for a entertaining, erotic, campy, and funny
movie, than this could be for you. If you want a good intelligent thriller,
look elsewhere.

Author
Justin Felix
Written by Stephen Peters.  
Directed by John McNaughton.  
Starring Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards, Bill
Murray, Robert Wagner.  
Rated R (contains nudity, profanity, and violence)  116 mins.  
Synopsis:  A wild teen-aged girl with an IQ around 200 manipulates a beefy
guidance counselor, a determined police detective, two trial lawyers, the
U.S. judicial system, the news media, a millionaire playgirl, and her
supersexy teen-aged daughter in an elaborate scheme to swindle millions of
dollars.  
Comments:  For this week, I have decided to review a movie currently
playing in theaters rather than an almost forgotten video collecting dust
in the far corner of a rental outlet.  This may become a trend as SPECIES
2, a sequel to one of the best bad sci-fi films of the decade, is set to be
released this Friday (April 10, 1998).
Anyway, this week's turkey is the sleazy, exploitative WILD THINGS, a film
which shares quite a number of conventions with many of the B-level,
direct-to-video-or-cable thrillers I have reviewed in the past.  The movie,
in fact, only possesses one noticeable difference: it has an all-star cast.
Let's be blunt for a moment.  Veteran film actors Kevin Bacon and Matt
Dillon are technically the main stars here; they are listed first in the
credits and the majority of the film's running time favors them.  WILD
THINGS' producers, however, heavily advertised this movie as an erotic
exercise between rising stars Neve Campbell and Denise Richards.  The movie
posters prominently feature the two rising out of a pool of water and
staring at the viewer with sultry gazes.  I suspect the target audience for
this film was predominantly younger males; though, surprisingly, the
matinee showing I attended with my friend had an audience with far more
women than men.  If one's only reason to see WILD THINGS is to see Ms.
Campbell and Ms. Richards get it on, then one will be remarkedly
disappointed.  A menage a trois does occur between the two ladies and Matt
Dillon, but it is a poorly-lit, seemingly superfluous scene.  The two also
kiss a couple of times, but it feels mechanic and obligatory rather than
racy as it was intended.  Neve Campbell, by the way, does not strip naked
at all.  Sorry, guys.
WILD THINGS' advertised sexual fireworks fizzle here, but the movie itself,
as bad movies go, is quite entertaining.  The actors turn in hammy
performances (more on this in a bit), and the surprisingly complex script
keeps the viewer guessing while the laughable dialogue is full of cheesy
lines undercutting the seriousness of the subject matter.  My friend and I
chuckled throughout the movie, but the rest of the audience didn't seem to
be in on it.  Don't go see WILD THINGS expecting a run-of-the-mill suspense
film.  (It's an amusing exercise in sleaze populated with comically
self-absorbed, greedy characters who all get what they deserve in the end.)  
Part of the film's qualified success comes from its cast.  A number of
fine, first-rate actors have fun with their characters.  The attractive,
young actress Denise Richards, of last year's megabudget STARSHIP TROOPERS,
nearly steals the show here as the pouty high-school student with a
supermodel body who catches everyone's eyes.  Neve Campbell, the scream
queen of SCREAM and SCREAM 2, drops her innocent, damsel-in-distress
routine and turns 180 degrees in her role as the trailer trash girl who
secretly instigates everything.  The best supporting nods go to Bill Murray
and Robert Wagner, both making surprise appearances in this, an atypical
film for either of them.  Bill Murray, in particular, is great as the
fraud-obsessed lawyer who can sniff a lawsuit from a mile away.  Robert
Wagner is hilarious in his wooden portrayal of another lawyer.  He seems to
be doing a self-parody of himself which reminds me of his brief role in the
John Candy vehicle DELIRIOUS.  
Despite its humorous dialogue and delightfully smarmy actors, WILD THINGS
cannot be excused for some of its shortcomings.  While the first two-thirds
of the movie moves at a breakneck pace, the last third becomes tired.
Without revealing too much, one character will kill another only to be
killed by someone else.  It becomes a cycle which tries the audience's
patience.  Also, though this film is designed to be unexpectedly funny, a
subplot deals with an affair that a guidance counselor has with two of his
students.  This seems inexcusably unethical and borders on pedophilia (the
students, to give WILD THINGS the benefit of the doubt, may be 18).  The
audience should feel uneasy when they realize they are viewing what is
supposed to be a sexual affair between a high school teacher and his
students.  
WILD THINGS ends on a somewhat unique note.  Important background
flashbacks are interspersed throughout the closing credits, and they are
rather fun to watch.  So, don't get up and walk out the theater as soon as
you see the closing credits start to roll at the end.
All in all, WILD THINGS is a pretty good and humorous turkey.  It's
certainly not for everyone, but for those who are into exploitative
thrillers like BASIC INSTINCT or SLIVER, you could find a lot worse than
this.  

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Theresa Russell, Denise
Richards, Robert Wagner, Bill Murray
Written by: Stephen Peters
Directed by: John McNaughton
Running Time: 113 minutes
I have to refrain from thinking like a typical guy as I review Wild
Things. A typical guy should just go nuts for this sort of trash,
easily giving it a rave review. I mean, how many male fantasies are
NOT presented to us on the screen? You've got lots of attractive women
either soaking wet, in bathing suits, their underwear, or just flat
out nude. You've got sex scenes, including girls making out with one
another. And you've got the world famous two-girl cat fighting. But
I'm not your typical guy. While all the above is pretty good stuff,
it's no different than your average direct-to-video stupid erotic
thriller. Thankfully though, Wild Things delivers in other
areas. Areas that real movies need to deliver in.
Wild Things is so sleazy that scum bag... I mean screenwriter Joe
Eszterhas (Showgirls, Jade) must be convinced that he wrote it. You've
got shades of Basic Instinct, Body Heat, and even Diabolique in
there. Taking place in South Florida, Matt Dillon plays a high school
guidance counselor (at a school which all the women are practically
bursting out of their clothing, and there's not one remotely
unattractive girl in the whole place). Early on in the film, he is
charged with rape by one of his students (Denise Richards). Then
another girl (Neve Campbell) also accuses Dillon of rape. What I've
just described is the basis of the film, yet I haven't even scratched
the surface on all the slime which will be presented to you. Nor will
I even try to do so. The story takes so many twists, turns, and
double-crosses that you just might get lost.
The cast is pretty good, one aspect that sets it apart from the
before-mentioned stupid erotic thriller. Now the dialogue is laughably
bad in most scenes, but it's usually delivered by the actors with that
sort of tongue-in-cheek attitude, as of they are saying "Yes, we know
it's silly too. Just watch." much like most of Starship Troopers
was. The writer obviously knows this isn't Citizen Kane, doesn't
he?. Bill Murray, brilliant as always, plays the strip-mall lawyer
that Dillon hires to defend him. He adds the intentional humor. He has
about 20 minutes of screen time, and it's all great stuff. The rest of
the cast seems to be acting adequately enough, with the possible
exception of Theresa Russell, who makes up for her bad acting by being
scantily dressed most of the time. And Kevin Bacon (who also
executive-produced) has one quick scene that will let you make as many
new "Six Degrees of Kevin Bacon" jokes as you'd like. When you see it,
you'll know what I mean.
A big problem I had was that the film spent way too much time trying
just to confuse the audience. Forget the fact that the amount of
double-crossing going on would just never work, what I'm talking about
are individual scenes which are presented to the audience solely to
fool us. Characters who have ulterior motives obviously have to act
inconspicuous around others, yet many times they just keep acting,
even when no one else is around!
Even as the closing credits start to roll, you'll want to stay in your
seat as the film will flash back to earlier events, explaining
itself. I don't believe I've ever seen that before, and it was a
pretty interesting idea. Just be sure to stay seated, people behind
you get pretty ticked off when you stand up to leave, and then keep
standing to watch the screen.
Wild Things is certainly trash, no doubt about that, but it's
entertaining trash. It knows it, and doesn't try to be anything but.
It's humorous, both intentionally and unintentionally. And the story,
while completely absurd, is interesting to watch unfold. And watching
it unfold around young scantily clad women climbing out of swimming
pools? Even better. [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: John McNaughton
Cast: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Theresa Russell, Denise
Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega
Screenplay: Kem Nunn, Stephen Peters
Producers: Steven A. Jones, Rodney M. Liber
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Columbia/Sony Pictures/Mandalay
Rated R: Strong sexuality, nudity, language, violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        I have a soft spot in my heart for pure, amoral sleaze.  I liked
Showgirls (there, I said it).  I typically enjoy myself when sitting
through that Eszterhaz, sex-filled cinematic tabloid-ish trash.  Wild
Things is the best sleazy film I've ever seen.  It's filled with great
performances, graphic sex, three-way sex, rape charges, double-crosses,
plot twists, genitalia of all genders, graphic violence, death, witty
humor, and, best of all, Denise Richards.
        Criticizing this film for being disgusting, raucous, and just plain
wrong is as fundamentally pointless as criticizing Citizen Kane for
being disturbing, or Titanic for being lofty and epic.  Wild Things is a
film that succeeds in its endeavors, but I don't just admire it for
this--I admire it for being so entertaining and such a fun time at the
movies.  I must admit up-front, however, that I am directly in the
center of the age group to which this film has been engineered to
appeal.  I imagine that this shows.
        It's hard to give a plot summary without giving away pieces that
shouldn't be known.  I thought I had the whole thing worked out from the
trailer, but I was wrong; there are a lot of turns here.  I'll just say
that the film takes place in Blue Bay, a rich little town in Florida. 
In Blue Bay lives Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon), a teacher who is accused
of rape by two of his students, Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards), and
Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell).  Kelly's mother, Sandra (Theresa Russell),
immediately presses charges.  
        All of this happens fairly early in the film.  And right up until this
point, I had the whole film predicted.  I was wrong, though, and every
time I was proven wrong, I was shocked.  Wild Things isn't even remotely
plausible, but it is so fun to see where the story takes us that the
implausibility of every scene is meaningless, and often invited, just
for kicks.    
        I remember first seeing the preview for Wild Things before The
Replacement Killers.  I'd give the preview four stars.  It made me want
to see the movie so much that I've been waiting for it anxiously ever
since.  Over the past few weeks though, I started to realize that there
was no way the film could live up to the preview (see Independence Day);
thankfully, I was proven wrong.  The preview for this film is one that
needs to be studied by marketing analysts of every distribution
company:  not only does it make us want to see the film, but it doesn't
give away any of the secrets.
        But I'm not here to talk about the preview.  I'm here to talk about
Denise Richards.  Now, I found her mildly interesting in Starship
Troopers, but in Wild Things she appeals to such a base instinct that
every scene she's in demands attention in a way that almost no other
performer can.  Of course, this might have something to do with her
oceanic eyes...and flawless body...but I thought she did a great job
acting, too (stop laughing).  No, Richards is truly a find--she is
talented, and always convincing in this film.  This mixed in with her
insane physical appeal makes her a vital asset to any film she may grace
in the future.  
        The other actors are good, too.  Dillon is as suave as ever (it's nice
to see him bouncing back from Albino Alligator and In & Out).  Bacon
does a good job acting all determined and stuff as a sex crimes
officer.  Neve Campbell gives the most layered performance of all of
them, though I won't pretend that any of these characters are deep and
complex.  For a plot like this to work, all of these people have to be
insane and basically contrived.  
        That's okay, because director John McNaughton knows that he's making a
self-consciously wicked film.  Each scene--even the three-way sex
scene--is observed with hilarity by McNaughton, and the result is a
sleaze-fest that's too smart to resist.  There isn't an inconsistent
moment in Wild Things:  every bit of it is alluring garbage, so trashy
it's funny, and so entertaining it's painful.  I loved it.

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
Yeah, yeah, the advertisements didn't even try to conceal the fact that this
movie had only one hook - sex. Neve Campbell and STARSHIP TROOPER's Denise
Richards getting it on? Ok! Yeah, it's a decent two minutes of film erotica,
but even if that's your main interest in this film, there's plenty of
cheeziness to sit thru in exchange for those two minutes.
WILD THINGS does have a lot more to think about than you might expect however.
Nearly every single scene is a huge plot twist guaranteed to leave you
guessing, or at least curious to see the next turn, throughout the entire
movie. But this fast-paced, razor-sharp turning of events doesn't leave much
time to enjoy the surprises. We start off in a high-class California high
school where every student resembles a supermodel in the making. Guidance
counselor Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) seems to catch the eye of every student,
particularly Kelly Van Ryan (Richards), daughter of the locally prestigious
family whose social status is about as high as their bank accounts. Right off
the bat, Kelly is using every asset she has in an effort to seduce "Mr.
Lombardo". The fund-raiser car wash seems the opportune time, particularly
when you wash your guidance counselor's jeep in all white clothes and take
plenty of precautions to insure you'll be soaked from head to toe when you're
done.
On the weekend of the car wash, Kelly's attempts at seduction fall flat, and
when they do, she concocts the tale that Sam in fact raped her that day.
Naturally Sam is thrown into a state of panicked shock at these accusations.
But the otherwise unsubstantial fabrications soon lead to a criminal trial
when a low-class, marijuana smoking student by the name of Suzie Toller
(Campbell) comes forth with a near identical story, also involving her trusted
guidance counselor. Pitting himself against the communities most respected
names and authoritarians, Sam must prove his innocence thru the aid of his
makeshift defense attorney, Ken Bowden, played by Bill Murray. Yes, that Bill
Murray!
Sound like a good, complete movie? Yes, that alone could have been, but this
is just the beginning. In fact, the trial is over about fifteen or twenty
minutes into the film. It is merely used to launch the most twisted story of
recent time. By the time the movie finishes, you will have gone thru every
plot twist imaginable. Unfortunately, with so much going on, you're not given
enough time in one predicament to be as effectively shocked when a new twist
comes about. This is just one way director John McNaughton fails to make this
movie as fun as it could've been. The 113 minutes fly by, and although it
never feels underdeveloped, this pretzel of storytelling could've been much
more richly realized had a slower pace been taken.
The acting is incredibly reminiscent of Fox prime-time soap operas, which no,
is not a good thing. And it's not just Campbell, who happens to hail from the
prime-time Fox soap "Party of Five", but everyone suffers from heavily
melodramatic overtones. Dillon, who was so charming in his understated role in
last year's IN & OUT, gives the best performance, and Murray's surprising
appearance adds some comedic flare to the film. In fact, if the whole movie
had been promoted as a subtle comedy, even if it was the exact same film, I
would actually give it a better grade. That's how cheezy it comes off. But
aside from these two, the rest offer nothing more than some good eye-full's.
In the right hands, WILD THINGS could've been a wickedly delightful,
scrumptiously twisted thriller, but instead we get juvenile overuses of
profanity and some very laughable displays of acting. And what's up with these
people passing as high school students? I realize Hollywood often casts older
actors to play teenage roles, but when I realized it wasn't supposed to be a
college they were at, I had to snicker. 
I won't lie - this is definitely a guilty pleasure. As corny as it is, it's
got some interesting aspects and could deserve at least a "B" for effort. But
if you just want to admire Denise Richards, go for last year's STARSHIP
TROOPERS, which was every bit as campy, but a million times better. Of course,
if seeing her breasts is your most important goal, you'll be right at home
with WILD THINGS. Perhaps the wildest thing of all is that somebody actually
looked at this and thought it deserved to be in theaters.

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Theresa Russell, Denise
Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega, Carrie Snodgress, Jeff Perry, Robert
Wagner, Bill Murray
Director: John McNaughton
Screenplay: Stephen Peters
The sound of drums beat heavily in time with the throb of jungle life
thrashing in the Florida swamps. The lustful note of this movie opens to
the angry snap of alligator jaws, as wild things sound their mating
call. The scent of pheromones lingers in the tepid air of the humid
climate. However, the animals aren't caged or lurking in the nearby
jungle, instead, they exist in a civilised community of man made wealth
next door  Blue Bay Florida.
The elite in the Bay dine at exclusive clubs, fuck who they wish and buy
what they want. A philanthropic school counsellor, Guy Lombardo (Matt
Dillon) who has done too many rounds, gets accused of raping two
schoolgirls. One is a drug addict and school misfit (Neve Campbell); the
other is the daughter (Denise Richards) of a prominent Bay family. What
follows is a series of bizarre twist and turns, literally both in bed
and in death, which will keep you guessing till the end.
Some people may find the unpredictable style of this movie to their
liking. However, it can also be annoyingly and unbelievable, to reach
the end only to be rudely awakened by three successive changes of plot.
Which in ways is reminiscent of the SCREAM franchise, which relies
heavily on the ferocious unpredictability of the story line.
If you haven't seen Matt Dillon (IN AND OUT) in a while, be prepared to
see a lot of him in this movie. He gets to show how talented he is in
bed and how group therapy poses no problems in his acting department.
Neve Campbell (SCREAM), has fallen into a genre of shlock, shock and now
sex movies, and her role in this movie is merely wild and depraved.
Whilst Miss Goody-Two-Shoes, Denise Richards (STARSHIP TROOPERS), plays
out her school girl fantasies in the most adult sort of a way. Then
there is also Theresa Russell, who also gets her share of bedtime.
Lots of raunchy sex which may or may not be therapeutic.

Author
R. L. Strong
Mandalay Entertainment presents a John McNaughton film. "Wild Things"
Kevin Bacon. Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Theresa Russell, Denise
Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega, Robert Wagner, Carrie Snodgress,  and Bill
Murray. Written by Kem Nunn & Stephen Peters. Cinematography by Jeffrey
L. Kimball. Music by George S. Clinton. Production Design by Edward T.
McAvoy. Costume Design by Kimberly A. Tillman. Edited by Elena Maganini.
Produced Steven A. Jones & Rodney M. Liber. Executive Producer: Kevin
Bacon. Directed by John McNaughton a Columbia Pictures release.  Rated R
   John McNaughton has fashioned one of the most joyful and funniest
thrillers in the past decade. Taking a very skewed look at the trend
towards 'film noir', "Wild Things" does for the thriller genre what Wes
Craven's "Scream" did for horror. That being, reinventing the genre by
using it's conventions to laugh with us at the absurdity of it.
   "Wild Things" starts off with a tense, playfulness. Sam Lombardo
(Matt Dillon) is a guidance counselor at a local college in Florida. He
is a heartthrob for the female student body. He leads an assembly
introducing some students to the local detectives, Ray Duquette (Kevin
Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega) for a discussion on Sex
Crimes. Tension mounts immediately when Suzie Toller leaves the
auditorium cursing on behalf of Duquette, (for what reason, we won't
learn until much later in the plot).
   The plot starts in earnest when Kelly Van Ryan (Denice Richards) and
her friend Nicole show up at Sam's home to wash his car (part of a
school credit program). Kelly has an obvious crush on Sam, and conspires
with her friend to be left alone with him.
   Events start to take a drastic turn when Sam is accused of rape. He
is suspended from his job, loses his home and is outcast from the port
town he lives.
   That's all of the plot that I'm going to reveal here. To give you any
more would be a great disservice to you. This is a film that has to be
savored and embraced. The performances are all top notch except for one.
Matt Dillon carries the film, with a marvelously subdued performance
that keeps you guessing as to the moral character of Sam Lombardo. Kevin
Bacon captures the angst and passion of a cop who is so disenchanted
with his job that he'd be willing to risk termination and possibly
prison to get out of it. The surprise performance is from up and comer
Neve Campbell. Having cut her teeth on the television series 'Party of
Five' and the films "SCREAM" and "SCREAM 2",  Ms. Campbell shows a rich
sense of drama and risk taking that most actresses would shy away from.
   The surprising supporting cast is a joy to watch. Seeing Theresa
Russell,  Robert Wagner  and Carrie Snodgress is only part of the magic
that "Wild Things" performs. The surprising and welcome cameo by Bill
Murray is one of the films most joyful and welcome surprises. His sleazy
attorney Ken Bowden is classic Murray, carrying the same screen
capturing quality of his earlier performances in "Caddyshack", "Mad Dog
& Glory" and "Groundhog Day". The standout performance here is from
newcomer Daphne Rubin-Vega. Cast as Det. Gloria Perez, Ms. Rubin-Vega
almost single-handedly holds the film from going over the edge into it's
sleazy undercurrent. Her performance is subtle and well defined and I
would be surprised if we don't see more of her in films to come, a
marvelous fresh new face. Additional credit must be given to director
John McNaughton, who handles this talented and diverse cast with all the
skill and dexterity of a Zubin Mehta holding sway over the Los Angeles
Philharmonic. The only false note in this film and a minor one is Denise
Richards. Her performance is not up to the caliber of the other cast
members, but she does try gamely. This being only her second major film,
Ms. Richards has a quality that captures the camera. While her
performance here is not as effectual as the others, it gives solid
evidence of a talent on the rise.
  The script by Kem Nunn & Stephen Peters is such a marvelously
constructed thriller, that the comedic qualities inherent in this genre
come to the forefront. This is what gives the film it's flow and energy.
Without that comedic touch, "Wild Things" would be only another in a
long line of dreary, generic erotic thrillers. The dialogue sparkles
with nuance and character, you almost feel that the lines are spoken
live and not rehearsed. While there is nothing here Tarrantino-like.
This is not dialogue that calls attention to itself. This is real people
speaking in the way people speak. Not everything is revealed in their
words, but is alluded to.
   The final kudos go to John McNaughton, who wrote and directed the
truly frightening "Henry, Portrait of a Serial Killer." and handled the
reigns of both "Mad Dog & Glory" and the under-rated "A Normal Life",
brings a true spirit of recklessness to the film. He knows when to punch
up the comedy and when to settle into suspense, sometimes crossing those
lines with such verve and skill that you can expect to be surprised come
Oscar time in '99.
   "Wild Things" is one of the most enjoyable films so far this year.
Hip, and knowingly so. But never so much so that it gives it's best
surprises away to it's audience without first winking at us. Just
remember to stay through the end credits for some very, very
entertaining  (and funny) tie ups to a  few loose ends.

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Kevin Bacon; Matt Dillon; Neve Campbell; Theresa Russell & Denise
Richards
If you were to judge Wild Things based on the advertising alone, it may be
reasonable for someone to conclude that it is nothing more than Hollywood's
version of a soft core porn flick. Considering most clips feature the very
well endowed Denise Richards walking around in very skimpy clothing. Of
course by now, most people have heard about the menage-a-trois involving
Kevin Bacon, Neve Campbell and the afore mentioned Ms. Richards. If that
wasn't enough you have also no doubt heard about Kevin Bacon's full frontal
nude scene. So with all this T&A being hyped and talked about, does the
movie have anything else besides sex and nudity. Much to my surprise, Wild
Things is a really good movie. Now I have to admit up front that the main
reason I went to this film, other than to review it, was for the over hyped
lesbian scenes. (Judging by the large proportion of males in the theater,
I'm not the only one who went because of that.)
Now Wild Things is sort of difficult to write a synopsis on. Not that it's
confusing, it's just one of those movies that you can't say too much about
before you start giving things away.
Wild Things revolves around a spoiled rich girl, Kelly Van Ryan, (Denise
Richards) and her claim that one of her high school teachers, Sam Lombardo,
(Matt Dillon) raped her. Kevin Bacon plays the police detective assigned to
the case, and Neve Campbell is the girl from the wrong side of the tracks
who comes forward with a similar charge against the teacher. Obviously not
everything is as it appears in Wild Things, but to say too much would ruin
the film. Let's just say that it is worth your time to go find out for
yourself. By the end of the movie nothing will surprise you anymore. This is
one well thought out movie.
As to performances -- having never been a big Matt Dillon fan I was
pleasantly surprised at how good he was in this film. Kevin Bacon also gave
one of his better performances in a while. Denise Richards who's only other
claim to fame was Starship Troopers does a good job here. She has a great
deal of potential, hopefully she will get recognized for her talent and not
just she looks. Too often talented actresses who happen to be well-endowed
fall into the trap of taking roles that involve nudity over substance.
(Natasha Henstridge is a good example.) Although,
I digress. Neve Campbell does a fair job, but seems to be taking roles that
are becoming more and more annoying. Theresa Russell also is in the film as
Denise Richard's over sexed mother. My question was, why? The woman is in
her 40's and they have her prancing around in a bikini. It was just
embarrassing. Robert Wagner has a cameo as Denise Richard's lawyer, while he
overacts in a way that would make William Shatner proud, it is good to see
him again in a film. The one to watch is Bill Murray as Matt Dillon's
attorney. Murray, as always is great, and unlike some of the films that he
has done in recent years, this time the writing backs up his talent. Murray
steals every scene he is in.
One other point about the movie that is interesting to note, is the end
credits. In recent years directors have taken to showing out takes and
bloopers during the end credits. Wild Things goes a step further. During the
credits they show how the events of the movie came to be. It's kind of like
a mini prequel. Its worth the extra few minutes that you have to stay in
your seat.
So if you want lots of sex, and shots of Denise Richards topless, then Wild
Things is the movie for you. If you are interested in a movie with a great
story and good overall acting, Wild Things fits the bill there too. It's
certainly going to rank as one of the most fun movies of the year.
8/10 (I would even rate it that high if Denise Richards wasn't naked)

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Former teen heartthrob Matt Dillon, playing Sam Lombardo, WILD
THINGS's poor persecuted hero, drives his beat-up jeep through an
isolated and heavily wooded road.  As JAWS-like music blasts through
the theater speakers, we see a sinister, black Range Rover moving into
attack position.  After the black car pushes Sam's into the river,
someone sends a mean-looking crocodile in after him to try to finish
him off.  The audience's reaction at my screening was to laugh at this
hokey scene, one of many such ones in WILD THINGS.
     First, the bad news.  WILD THINGS, unlike STARSHIP TROOPERS and
SCREAM, isn't smart enough to realize that its only hope is as a
parody.  One of the film's minor roles, a slimy but cheap lawyer named
Ken Bowden, is acted for maximum comedic pleasure by Bill Murray.  But
only Murray gets it.  The other actors have been hoodwinked by director
John McNaughton into believing that they are in a serious thriller.
(If you've seen the delightful movie LOVE AND DEATH ON LONG ISLAND with
its intentionally awful HOT PANTS COLLEGE II as a movie-with-the-movie
spoof, you may begin to wonder if you just walked into HOT PANTS
COLLEGE I.)
     Now, the good news.  The show does become laughably bad with its
many highly predictable twists and turns.  And if you like shows played
for maximum titillation, you'll like the nudity and the hot sex - you
even get a threesome.  For those seeking an intelligent script, this
one by Kem Nunn and Stephen Peters will undoubtedly leave you as
frustrated as some of the oversexed teenagers in the movie.
     In the beginning Kevin Bacon, as straight-arrow Detective Ray
Duquette of the sex crimes unit, lectures a high school assembly in the
wealthy little town of Blue Bay.  "What is a sex crime?" he asks the
students.  "Not get'n any," one yells back.  In this hamlet full of
ranging hormones the kid was essentially enunciating one of the town's
axioms.
     When 18-year-old Kelly Van Ryan, one of the richest of Blue Bay's
spoiled rich kids, sets her eyes on Sam, she determines to fall all
over him to seduce him.  When even a see-through wet shirt and shorts
don't do the trick, she accuses him of rape.  This encourages fellow
student Suzie Toller to come through with her own false rape claim.
     As Kelly, Denise Richards, who was so perfectly cast in STARSHIP
TROOPERS, is wasted.  She does little more than show off her body,
which admittedly is worth displaying.  Neve Campbell from SCREAM plays
Suzie.  Neve, who stays fully clothed, doesn't have much challenging
work to do either.
     Theresa Russell plays Kelly's oversexed mom, Sandra.  Like Sam,
she tries to bed most of the town's members of the opposite sex.  A
compassionate mother, she attends to Kelly's needs, if it's convenient.
("Can I get you anything?  Do want a Valium?")
     In a movie that telegraphs its every punch, Detective Ray Duquette
lectures Suzie's ex-boyfriend as a way to talk to the audience.
"People aren't always what they appear to be," he tells us in case we
are in danger of not guessing the obvious.  "Don't forget that," he
throws in for good measure to make sure we are paying attention.
Suitably admonished not to believe anyone, we don't, which gives the
upcoming twists away for those few who haven't already guessed them by
that point.
     Could the movie have been better?  Absolutely.  Bill Murray
understood the material even if no one else did.  Imagine what this
cast could have done with Murray in the director's chair.  Then we
would have had a wildly funny movie rather than this one of cheap
thrills and a few laughs.
     WILD THINGS runs 1:53.  It is rated R for full-frontal nudity,
sex, dope smoking, profanity, and some violence and would be fine for
older teenagers.
     WILD THINGS opens nationwide in the United States today, March 20,
1998.  In the San Jose area, it is playing at the AMC and Century
theaters.

Author
Alex Ioshpe
"..People are not what they seem to be.."
                          John McNaughton has created a streamy, hip, sexy,
at times funny and constantly surprising detective investigation. Its trashy
style, with plentiful sex, nudity and murder will thrill the neo-noir fans
and the MTV generation. It's a well made thriller that completely catches
and engages the viewer in its complicated web of grizzly events following
one after another.
"Wild Things" can be compared to Wes Craven's "Scream". That being,
reinventing the genre by using it's conventions to laugh with us at the
absurdity of it. It is more serious and complicated, than Craven's
reinvention, but at least as entertaining and interesting to watch.
"Wild Things" starts off with a tense, playfulness. Sam Lombardo (Matt
Dillon) is a guidance counselor at a local college in Florida. He is a
heartthrob for the female student body. He leads an assembly introducing
some students to the local detectives, Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria
Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega) for a discussion on Sex Crimes. Tension mounts
immediately when Suzie Toller leaves the auditorium cursing on behalf of
Duquette, (for what reason, we won't learn until much later in the plot).
The plot starts in earnest when Kelly Van Ryan (Denice Richards) and her
friend Nicole show up at Sam's home to wash his car (part of a school credit
program). Kelly has an obvious crush on Sam, and conspires with her friend
to be left alone with him. Events start to take a drastic turn when Sam is
accused of rape. He is suspended from his job, loses his home and is outcast
from the port town he lives.
This is all I intend to reveal of the plot to not spoil the impression.
Actually, even if I wanted to, I could never have done it, since the complex
story would unfold on multiple pages.
Visually the film is a perfect example on what we call "Hollywood-style":
impressive cinematography, fast paced editing and wisely chosen locations.
This creates the right atmosphere of an appearing innocence covering up the
horrifying reality. There are some brilliant scenes, miscellaneously edited,
where monstrous alligators appear slowly from the pure and clear waters.
This, at first glance unnoticeable parallel, is clearly the film's real
strength - showing the unsettling difference between a world we want to see
and what this world really is. "..People are not what they seem to be.." The
characters should appear as beautiful, attractive and charming, which is in
direct opposition to who they really are. Generally the acting is above
average, but not above the level of what we are used to expect from intense
thrillers. McNaughton knowingly lets the plot overshadow the characters.
This action naturally sets new demands for the script. " I don't like most
thrillers I see. I read the first five pages of the script, and I can
already predict what will happen on the last two pages. Most are very
clichd," says the director. His plot really presents a twisting story,
providing surprising (maybe even too clever) turns and twists. It presents
mysteries that compound themselves into sub-mysteries to trick and deceive
audiences with the resolution embedded at the end (the screenwriter has
included so many elements that they had to be explained between the closing
credits). And there are offcourse some logical mistakes, flops and failures
along the way. Towards the end it gets so weird that you'll have to wonder
what the director was thinking. They tried hard to make it as unpredictable
as possible, but they tried too hard. As the events are progressing, you
might just think of the most unexpected and unrealistic thing to happen, and
it probably will.
By going a bit too far, McNaughton excludes his chances to be the creator of
one of the most interesting thrillers released during this decade.
Review written by Alex Ioshpe (C) 1998

Author
James Berardinelli
United States, 1998
U.S. Release Date: 3/20/98 (wide)
Running Length: 1:48
MPAA Classification: R (Male full-frontal nudity, female topless nudity, 
      graphic sexual activity, frequent profanity, violence)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 2.35:1
Cast: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Theresa Russell, 
      Denise Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega, Carrie Snodgress, Jeff Perry, 
      Robert Wagner, Bill Murray
Director: John McNaughton
Producers: Steven A. Jones, Rodney M. Liber
Screenplay: Stephen Peters
Cinematography: Jeffrey L. Kimball
Music: George S. Clinton
U.S. Distributor: Columbia Pictures
     WILD THINGS is a way to steam up an otherwise dreary early spring 
day provided, of course, that you're the victim of a frontal lobotomy.  
There is, in fact, no doubt about who this motion picture is aimed at:  
movie-goers in their late teens and early twenties -- the most lucrative 
target group.  This is film noir for the MTV generation:  fast-paced, 
slick, flashy, gleefully mindless, and hollow to the core.  WILD THINGS 
is easily one of the five dumbest movies to arrive in theaters during 
the first eleven weeks of 1998.  I've seen more convincing drama (with 
nearly as much bare flesh) on that pinnacle of narrative quality, 
BAYWATCH.  
     WILD THINGS wants to dupe viewers into thinking it's a thriller 
with a real story.  What it is, however, is a series of increasingly-
improbable and shockingly predictable plot twists.  Everything in 
between those serpentine moments is filler -- a flash of a breast, a 
spatter of blood, and some of the most idiotic dialogue this side of a 
Steven Seagal movie.  The film tries so hard to surprise its audience 
that the twists end up being easy to guess -- just take a stab at the 
most unlikely thing to happen, and that will probably be it.  Using this 
approach, I was right three times and wrong only once.  That's not a 
good average for a production that wants to keep viewers in the dark 
about what's around the next corner.
     The ad campaign uses two things to sell this movie:  the hot, young 
cast and the old standby, sex.  Both have an abundance of screen time, 
although I'll admit that the film's erotic content is somewhat less 
impressive than I expected.  Nothing about WILD THINGS is exceptionally 
risqu.  The soft-core sex sequences are generic, and don't generate 
much heat.  The lesbian kisses can't hold a candle to those in BOUND.  
Theresa Russell and Denise Richards have only token topless appearances 
(Neve Campbell, possessing an iron-clad "no nudity" clause in her 
contract, keeps her clothes more or less on).  The film's greatest 
curiosity is a full frontal shot of Kevin Bacon climbing out of the 
shower.  Maybe a few girls will skip seeing a fully-clothed Leonardo 
DiCaprio for the thirteenth time in TITANIC to catch a glimpse of what 
Kyra Sedgwick (Mrs. Kevin Bacon) is familiar with.  
     The director of WILD THINGS is John McNaughton, whose last effort 
was the finely-tuned psychological thriller, NORMAL LIFE.  That movie 
featured copious sex, a pair of real characters, and a powerful script.  
It's difficult to believe that something this shallow could come from 
the same film maker.  But I suppose we all need to put food on the 
table.  McNaughton appears to have completely lost his way here, in what 
is obviously a stab at mainstream success (his previous wide-release 
picture, MAD DOG AND GLORY, was a box-office disappointment).  Quick 
cuts and pretty sunrises can't even begin to cover up this movie's 
flaws.
     The main character (and I use that term lightly, since no one in 
WILD THINGS shows more than an occasional flash of personality) is Sam 
Lombardo (Matt Dillon), a guidance counselor at Florida's Blue Bay High 
School.  A student, the deliciously curvaceous Kelly Van Ryan (Denise 
Richards), has a crush on him.  One afternoon, she comes to his house to 
wash his car, and, when she leaves, her clothing is torn.  After 
confessing to her mother (Theresa Russell) that she was raped, she goes 
to the police station, where she tells her story to detectives Ray 
Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega).  They are 
skeptical about here claims until another girl, Suzie Toller (Neve 
Campbell), comes forward with a similar tale.  Meanwhile, Sam, convinced 
that he's being set up, goes to a shyster lawyer (Bill Murray) for help.
     The acting in WILD THINGS isn't very good, but none of the 
principals have much to work with. This is definitely not a character-
based motion picture.  Not only does the ludicrous screenplay ignore the 
possibility that someone in the audience may have a triple-digit I.Q., 
but it doesn't bother to give any of the on-screen individuals even a 
hint of depth.  The men and women populating the picture are there to 
look nice, but nothing more.  Matt Dillon is given plenty of 
opportunities to flex his biceps.  Neve Campbell gets to model the 
slutty look.  Denise Richards strikes a fetching pose in a see-through, 
one-piece bathing suit.  And nothing in the film gets a rise out of 
Kevin Bacon.  The only one who's even remotely interesting is Bill 
Murray, and he seems to think he's in comedy, not a thriller (maybe he's 
got the right idea).
     Columbia Pictures has specifically requested that critics not 
reveal the film's ending, which prompts the question:  which ending do 
they want kept secret?  WILD THINGS has no less than three (one occurs 
during the end credits, so stay seated), all of which are jaw-droppingly 
absurd -- a feat that Joe Eszterhas (the writer of BASIC INSTINCT and 
SHOWGIRLS) would be impressed by.  Thanks to Jeffrey Kimball's polished, 
kinetic cinematography, WILD THINGS always looks great, and George S. 
Clinton's score keeps it pulsing and throbbing.  But, no matter how 
shiny the superficial sheen is, this is still trash, and, like all 
garbage, it stinks.  
Now with more than 1400 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"My belief is that no movie, nothing in life, leaves people neutral. You
either leave them up or you leave them down."

Author
David Wilcock
(COLUMBIA PICTURES)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 51 MINUTES
STARRING KEVIN BACON, MATT DILLON, NEVE CAMPBELL AND DENISE RICHARDS
DIRECTED BY JOHN MCNAUGHTON
Wild Things is so outrageously bad, it actually turns out to be a wildly
enjoyable movie. Matt Dillon plays Sam Lombardo, a hunky teacher who Kelly
Van Ryan (Richards) is desperately in love with. She flirts with him like
crazy, and manages to get inside his house (with a soaking, see through
T-shirt, obviously.) However, the s*** hit's the fan for Sam when Kelly runs
out of the house claiming that Sam raped her. And when a second student,
Suzie Toller (Campbell) also claims that Sam raped her, Sam hires lawyer Ken
Bowden (A totally out of place and completely hillarous Bill Murray) to
defend him. Hot on Sam's tail all this time is police officer Ray Dequette
(Kevin Bacon, who is also executive producer) who suspects that not all is
what it seems. And when the court case finishes nearly halfway through the
film, the audience starts to begin something fishy is happening as well. And
they have every right to expect something strange, because the film really
starts piling on the twists halfway through.
Wild Things is poorly acted, badly written, clumsily directed and great fun.
Matt Dillon looks confused throughout the whole movie. Denise Richards
(Starship Troopers, 1997) cannot act at all. If she was suddenly replaced
with a urangutang halfway through the movie, no-one would notice (until the
nude scenes, of course.) Kevin Bacon has set the switch on the back of his
neck to 'autopilot' and dosen't even attempt any acting throughout the whole
movie. Bill Murray was probably wondering what the hell he was doing in the
movie. His 'wise guy' image is completely out of place, yet somehow his
performance just clicks in. Neve Campbell, in a much better role than the
one she had in Scream 2 (1997) has great fun throughout the whole movie. Oh,
if you're just going to see Wild Things to have a look at Campbell nude,
forget it. Thanks to her 'no nudity' clause in her contract, all you can see
is her bare back. Murray and Campbell are the best things in the film
because they now this film is absolute crap. Unfortunately, Dillon, Bacon
and Richards take on their roles far too seriously. But instead of being
boring, all three are so bad, they're fun. Theresea Randell also provides
some unexpected hilarity as Kelly's sex crazed mother.
The director, John McNaughton, has no idea what to do with the film. So he
does nothing with it. He just points the camera at the actors. There are
some nice shots of the Everglade swamps, and the sex scenes are well done
(even if you see none of Campbells 'jucier' parts.) The writer, Stephen
Peters, seemed to have become so obssessed with twists that he forgot to
write good dialogue. The twists are fun, though, and some of them are pretty
good. By the end, though, the amount of twists is so overwhelming you'll
just be shouting at the film to just 'stop pulling all these goddamn
twists!' (well, maybe you won't, but I certainly did.)
But despite Wild Things being the absolutely pits in terms of acting,
writing and directing, there's something memerizing and throughly enjoyable
about Wild Things. It's so bad, it's actually good. Far more enjoyable then
the recently released Deep Impact and Scream 2, Wild Things is actually well
worth watching. In the end, Wild Things is nothing but pure, commercial
entertainment, and if you're looking for a brainless good time, Wild Things
fit's the bill.
 DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: John McNaughton
Writer: Stephen Peters
Starring: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Denise Richards, Daphne
Rubin-Vega, Teresa Russell, Robert Wagner, Bill Murray, Jeff Perry, Carrie
Snodgress, Jennifer Bini
When Guidance Counselor Ray Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) gives a lecture on
sex crimes, asking exactly what is a sex crime, one of the students replies
"Not gettin' any!"  What better way would there be to set the tone for this
film, which is campy, ridiculous, trashy?  "Wild Things" is one of the most
proposterous thrillers, and I'm confident in saying that save for the
direction, the presence of major stars, and high production values, this
film has no difference than something you'd see on UHF at 2:30 in the
morning on any given weeknight, and just a hair bit less sex and nudity
than some erotic thriller you'd see on Cinemax starring Shannon Tweed.  But
as I said, there's still the direction.
"Wild Things" is trash.  I'm blunt about this.  It's a film that features
awful dialogue, some really bad acting, too many twists, no one protagonist
to follow and admire, and some truly ridiculous moments.  It also features,
simultaneously, delightfully bad dialogue, wonderfully campy performances,
so many twists that it's fun, no moral characters, and some moments which
have the same kind of comic appeal as a Marx Brother movie.  Yes, "Wild
Things" is trash; it's your decision whether or not that's a bad thing.
"Wild Things" is the second Florida noir of the year, taking place in a
giant town near the Everglades.  The opening shot is a maginficent montage
surrounding the area, showing not only the alligators and swamp areas, but
also the large homes, suggesting a possible parallel between the two (and
how right it is).  And the music by George S. Clinton is a wonderful mix of
B-grade jazz noir music and Bernard Herrman Hitchcock music (I swear, he
took riffs from "Psycho"). Here, we enter into a high school, and are
introduced to two character students: Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards,
previously a star of "Starship Troopers"), as a popular high school
cheerleader; and Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell, dirtied up considerably), a
white trash...or swamp trash outsider who smokes pot and dresses wildly.
Apparently Kelly has a big school girl crush on Sam, and after she enters
his house after washing his jeep one Sunday morning, she exits with her
clothes torn up, and swearing that Sam raped her.  Her wealthy slut mom
(Teresa Russell, who I haven't seen since the 80s...and no, I didn't see
"Whore") hears about it, and into the scene come two Law Enforcement
Officers - Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne Rubin-Vega,
from the original cast of "Rent"), who investigate Sam while he gets
himself a shyster lawyer, Ken Bowden (Bill Murray), who we meet as he's
wearing a false neck brace because "some insurance men were hanging
around."  To make things interesting, Suzie enters back into the scene,
claiming that she was also raped by Sam earlier on.
To explain anything from this point on would be a really nasty thing to do;
it gets really really wacky, events blow up that you don't think would
occur, and, well, things get really fun.  Earlier this year, "Palmetto"
came out and while that film didn't possess the campy wit it really needed
to make it fun (apparently: I didn't see it), this one does.  Director John
McNaughton ("Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer," "Mad Dog and Glory")
directs this with tongue placed firmly in cheek, making the film an almost
comedy, if viewed in the right way.  He gets great help from friend Murray
who is the funniest he's been in a real long time.  Just to see him adds a
lot of comic air into the film.  He also gets mileage out of Robert Wagner,
who, sadly, hasn't been able to be taken seriously as an actor for a long
time, but who, gladly, puts a campy spin on himself (just to see him makes
me giggle; to hear him say sternly "You're finished in this town!" is
downright hilarious).
Meanwhile, Kevin Bacon plays his role delightfully Joe Friday for most of
the film, Matt Dillon is wonderfully B-grade serious, Neve Campbell
abandons her usual good girl schtick and comes across hilariously, Teresa
Russell is wonderfully bitchy and post-seductive, and Denise Richards goes
completely south of the border with a performance so campy and wacky it's
admirable.  Sure, it may seem like bad acting, but it's supposed to.
The film has no center, and is constantly switching protagonists.  I
actually liked this approach.  It was manipulative, so that the viewer
never knows exactly what is going on, but instead of playing this straight,
which would have killed the film, it plays this for laughs.  After about
the fifth or sixth twist, I just started laughing at every one afterwards. 
This also creates for a very fun film to keep track of, as anything can
happen at several points, such as two distinctive moments where we see
characters go into houses, never see inside, but see the outcome, not sure
how it reached there.  Even in the end credits, the film is showing us the
past, trying to explain itself because of this approach.  Thankfully, it
works.
And...as an added bonus for some, there IS some sexual content, such as a
threesome (between three actors I won't mention here), and some good old
lesbian action (between two actresses I won't mention here).  I also should
just warn those guys who watch "Party of Five" religiously that no, Neve
Campbell does not get naked.  But Kevin Bacon does.  Be warned though.
The result of "Wild Things" is a film that is campy, trashy, but just plain
fun.  It's a guilty pleasure, an aquired taste.  Many people may be
completely turned off by all the sex, ridiculous plot twists, and all the
other crap in this film.  Then again, others like me may have a great time
watching it.  It's something you watch so that you can guess all the
twists, but not to take them seriously because, after all, how could you
take some of these twists seriiously.  "Wild Things" is a film you enjoy or
you don't.  There's no middle ground.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Columbia Pictures/Mandalay Entertainment
 Director:  John McNaughton
 Writer:  Stephen Peters
 Cast: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Bill Murray,
Theresa Russell, Denise Richards, Daphne Rubin-Vega,
Robert Wagner
   Many a tale has exploited the theme, "Things and people
are not always what they seem to be."  This is the perfect
concept for designing a thriller which twists and turns, its
ending unpredictable--at least by anyone who hasn't seen
scores of films that center on humankind's infinite capacity for
double-dealing.  You may or may not guess the finale of "Wild
Things," and the audience is advised not to reveal the
conclusion, but notwithstanding your ability to foretell the
future, you'll find "Wild Things" a hoot.  This movie, directed
by John McNaughton--known for his low-budget, cultish 
"Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer"--is more conventional than 
his subsequent features, such as "The Borrower" and Eric
Bogosian's one-man "Sex, Drugs, Rock & Roll," and features
humor, both intended and unintentional, that evokes laughter
along with its tension.
   Using a broad, satiric brush to reproach the legal profession
(Bill Murray as a criminal attorney?), the influence wielded by
the super-rich, and even the sorts of sordid plots that have
long kept the novels of, say, Dean Koontz on best-seller lists
forever, Stephen Peters's script deals with conspiracies woven
in the upscale yachting town of Blue Bay Florida, where
wealthy women wield influence over the institutions of banking
and education and get to choose their favorite deck boy or
other servant for their daily bed partners.  
   With the alligator-swarming waters of the Everglades
providing an apt metaphor for the twisted intrigues and
machinations of the wage slaves as well as the rich and
powerful, "Wild Things" focuses on a popular high-school
guidance counselor, Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon), whose
interest in the dazzling senior student, Kelly Van Ryan
(Denise Richards), goes beyond allowing her to wash his jeep
one Sunday.  The daughter of the town's wealthiest woman,
Sandra Van Ryan (Theresa Russell), Kelly is accustomed to
getting what she wants, though she seems to despise her
provocative mother to the same degree that she is drawn to
Sam.  After inviting herself inside Sam's downscale home, she
leaves in tears, confessing to her mother and to detectives
Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and Gloria Perez (Daphne
Rubin-Vega) that she had been raped by the teacher.  When
a vulgar misfit, Suzie Toller (Neve Campbell), comes forward
with a similar story of rape, Sam is brought to trial defended
by an ambulance-chasing lawyer, Ken Bowden (Bill Murray). 
As the seemingly open-and-shut case proceeds in the
courtroom, there develops a series of accusations that sends
spectators reeling, after which follows a sequence of events
involving the detectives, the guidance counselor, the students
and their parents.
   Some of the best segments of the movie are its comic
moments, particularly its throwaway remarks.  As Sam
lectures a senior seminar in the school auditorium, he asks
the youngsters, "What is a sex crime?"  "Not gettin' it," replies
a quick-thinking and absolutely correct 17-year-old.  Bill
Murray does particularly well in the humor department as an
attorney whose walls are covered with pictures of his client,
who all appear to be happily waving to him as they support
themselves on their crutches.  Sporting a brace about his
neck, he explains to his client, Sam, "I don't wear this all the
time...but some of the insurance guys are hanging around." 
Murray is one of those comics that can make you laugh just
by looking at him, his angelic face and twinkling eyes
signaling that yet another one-liner is coming.  "Hold my
calls," he announces pretentiously to his secretary in an office
obviously bereft of clients.  
   Photographer Jeffrey Kimball points his camera to the
obvious symbols of Floridian swampland such as the
menacing alligators but does not otherwise exert himself to
provide a particular noir or other atmospheric core to the film. 
But Denise Richards is good to look at, her young rival Suzie
Toller effectively ribald, and Matt Dillon does what he can to
keep his young female audience glued to his impressive
biceps.  There is also a sizzling, almost soft-core scene
involving Sam, Suzie and Kelly.  Theresa Russell does a
charming sendup of haute bourgeois women in her role as an
heiress who pretty much runs the town.  But Kevin Bacon is
virtually wasted in a straight role of obsessed and humorless
detective.
   "Wild Things" is a fun movie about a community of people
with larceny in their hearts, which delivers humor, some
whodunit mystery, and quite a few samples of good-old trashy
dialogue.  Rated R.  Running Time: 113 minutes.  (C) 1998
Harvey Karten

Author
James Brundage
I suppose it has to be one of the sleaziest films I've ever seen. It also
has to be one of the most sexual, and most ambiguous. But since when have
things like that stopped normal American's from having a good time? Doesn't
anyone remember Basic Instinct, which turned an ice pick from a kitchen
utensil to the weapon of choice for murders, or Fatal Attraction, in which
the rabbit being killed became a cultural icon? What about Body of Evidence,
which asked if you could screw someone to death and gave us Madonna to prove
the point?
Wild Things is the newest in the lasting trend of movies intertwining sex,
violence, and mystery in a way we can't help think of as fun. It pits in
Kevin Bacon doing a decent job, Matt Dillon doing his normal great, and Neve
Campbell and Teresa Russell getting good roles early on in their careers. I
won't tell you much, only that there's one plot twist after the next in this
movie that hides a brain behind a bunch of sex and lies (and even a bit of
videotape, too). No one's the good guy, everyone's the bad guy, and you get
to watch a mystery unravel before your eyes while seeing and the sex we've
come to expect from a movie with a threesome in it.
It's controversial. It's something the Christian coalition will hate and the
Vatican will declare a sacrilege, but, by god, it's fun to watch.

Author
James Kendrick
Director: John McNaughton
Screenwriter: Stephen Peters
Stars: Kevin Bacon (Ray Duquette), Matt Dillon (Sam Lombardo), Neve
Campbell (Suzie Toller), Theresa Russell (Sandra Van Ryan), Denise
Richards (Kelly Van Ryan), Daphne Rubin-Vega (Gloria Perez), Carrie
Snodgress (Ruby), Jeff Perry (Bryce Hunter), Robert Wagner (Tom Baxter),
Bill Murray (Ken Bowden)
MPAA Rating: R
Review: *** (out of ****)
Making good sleaze is more difficult than you would expect, and "Wild
Things" is one of the best sleaze movies to come out since "Basic
Instinct."
Director John McNaughton, who first came on the scene in 1989 when he
stunned audiences with his ultra-low budget shocker "Henry: Portrait of
a Serial Killer," lets "Wild Things" be exactly what it should be: a
twisting, luridly depraved Southern noir tale of sex, scandal, and
devious plotting. It doesn't make the "Showgirls" mistake of taking
itself too seriously, but neither does it take the John Waters route of
sinking into complete camp. The movie resides somewhere in the middle,
making it amusing, shocking, erotic, and inarguably absorbing, all at
the same time.
Because plot secrets are so important to making "Wild Things" an
enjoyable experience, I will only reveal what happens during the first
half-hour.
Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) is a handsome high school guidance counselor
in the small, rich community of Blue Bay, Florida (the town's name
itself seems to drip of sex). Kelly Van Ryan (Denise Richards), a
beautiful high school seductress with thick lips and a thoroughly
aerobicized body, has had her eye on Lombardo for several years. Kelly
is the daughter of Sandra Van Ryan (Theresa Russell), an elitist rich
slut who has her own past with Lombardo. Kelly's father, a real estate
tycoon, had committed suicide a year earlier, leaving Kelly and Sandra
living in the lap of luxury.
One day, Kelly comes over to Lombardo's house to wash his car for a
community service project. She and girlfriend flirt shamelessly outside
by spraying each other with hoses, all of which is filmed by McNaughton
like a "Playboy" video. Kelly comes into Lombardo's house, dripping wet,
with that look in her eye. The screen fades to black, and when we
next see her, she is walking out of Lombardo's house, looking somewhat
disheveled and very perturbed. What happened in there?
Kelly answers that question by accusing Lombardo of rape. Police
detective Ray Duquette (Kevin Bacon) and his partner, Gloria Perez
(Daphne Rubin-Vega) begin to look into the case, but they have
suspicions that Kelly is fabricating the story. That is, until Suzie
Toller (Neve Campbell), a  another senior at Blue Bay High who happens
to be from the wrong side of the tracks, accuses Lombardo of raping her
a year earlier. It seems to be a closed case, because the stories Kelly
and Suzie tell are extremely similar, and it has already been
established that they are enemies at school, so they couldn't have
conspired together.
The case goes to court, with Bill Murray in an amusing supporting role
as Lombardo's cut-rate attorney. Things go hay-wire at the trial, and
from there "Wild Things" spins down a spiral of deceit, murder, and
double- and triple-crosses of all parties involved. By the time it is
arriving at its conclusion, we don't know who or what to trust anymore
because we've been so thoroughly spun around. "Wild Things" is the kind
of movie where the question isn't who's innocent and who's guilty, but
who's guilty of what. It gets so complicated that McNaughton includes
bit scenes during the credits that flesh out the explanation of how it
all transpired.
The screenplay, by Stephen Peters, is tightly written and offers more
surprises that three other movies put together. Because the script has
no shame and no pretensions, McNaughton is free to take the material to
its limits. A script like this deserves the full treatment, and
McNaughton comes through; any time he has the chance to be overtly
sexual or leeringly sensationalistic, like Paul Verhoeven before him, he
goes for it. And who can blame him? The story is screaming out for it
(when co-producer and star Bacon first read it, he described as "the
trashiest piece of crap" he had ever read). "Wild Things" isn't asking
to be legitimized; it's just good old-fashioned, nasty fun.
The A-list cast in both main and supporting roles gives "Wild Things" a
little more stamina than a straight-to-video release with a group of
no-names (although the material is roughly the same). Dillon, although a
little too sexy and handsome to be taken for a high school counselor, is
nonetheless effective in his role. Our sympathies are with him from the
outset, and it is exactly those emotions that come into play later.
Richards, who had previously been seen battling giant bugs in "Starship
Troopers," proves here that she is an actress of decidedly limited
range. I would be surprised to see her career reach great heights.
However, she can act thoroughly sultry and seductive without losing the
appearance that she is a 17-year-old with far too much experience, which
is essential to the story's success. Too many "teenagers" in movies look
like they're 28.
And, for those who are used to Neve Campbell in her role on "Party of
Five" or even in the two "Scream" movies, watch out. Her portrayal of a
drug-addled loser with too much black eye-make-up (Hollywood's new
calling card for troubled girls) is an eye-opener, especially in its
physical elements (remember that just because her contract has a
no-nudity clause, that doesn't rule out other things . . .)
To sum up, if you're easily offended, stay away from "Wild Things."
However, if you don't mind a little bit of artful sleaze every once in a
while, you can't do much better.

